 Now we have four-month-old mice that no longer have diabetes.
 According to a warning from Dr Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and chair of the Canadian Diabetes Association's clinical and scientific director, the research is still in its early stages.
 As well as some other experts, he doubts that diabetes can be cured, noting that these discoveries don't relate to people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sarah Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy, publicly stated on a Swedish radio station Sveriges that the Academy, which had failed to contact Bob Dylan directly and inform him that he had won the Nobel Prize in literature for 2016,
 Danius said, I've been calling and sending Emails to his closest aide and getting very friendly replies.
 Earlier, Ring's Ceo, Jamie Siminoff, noted that this company started with him not hearing a doorbell at his garage.
 He said he created a doorbell that works off of WiFi.
 Siminoff said sales grew after his appearance on the show Shark Tank in 2013, where the show's panel of investors declined to fund his startup.
 In late 2017, Siminoff appeared on the shopping channel, QVC.
 In addition, Ring settled a lawsuit with a competitor, the security firm ADT Corporation.
 Despite the fact that there is a vaccine capable of reducing Ebola virus deaths,
 The ZMapp cocktail initially showed promise in this area, but official studies have shown it to be less effective in preventing death than was previously thought.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning that researchers used it as a baseline and compared it to three other treatments.
 The USA gymnastics board supports the letter from the U S . Olympic Committee and agrees with the absolute necessity of creating a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC statement that it is in the best interest of our athletes, clubs, and their sports to reform within our organization, not to have it decertified.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could shed light on how such abuse, so bravely described by survivors,
 The U S . gymnastics and Olympic committees have the same goal of making gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible so that they can pursue their goals in a safe, positive environment and be empowered with all of the rights.
 In the nineteen sixty s, Brzezinski served as a counselor to John F . Kennedy, then as a counselor to Lyndon B . Johnson.
 During the 1976 election, he advised Carter on foreign policy, and then from 1977 to 1981, he served as the National Security Advisor, replacing Henry Kissinger.
 As a national security advisor, he helped Carter in the Camp David accords of 1978, the normalization of U.S. relations with China in the late 1970s, the Iranian hostage crisis of 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 This film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, received nominations in all of the major categories.
 Gosling and stone received nominations for best actor and actress respectively.
 Among the other nominations are best picture, director, cinematography, costume design, editing, original music, production design, sound, and original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition and City of Stars, were nominated for best original song, and the studio, Lionsgate, was nominated in 26 categories, more than any other studio.
 Late on Sunday, U S . President Donald Trump, through a press Secretary, said U S . troops would be withdrawn from Syria.
 The statement came after Trump had a phone call with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 In addition, Turkey will play a leading role in the question of protecting captured ISIL fighters, which, according to the statement, European states have refused to return home.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, which is already a widely accepted theory, but it also provides details that are usually not available from fossil remains, such as color and three-dimensional structure.
 Scientists say that the animal's plumage was a rich chestnut-brown color on top and a pale, or carotenoid, pigmentation on the underside.
 The find also allows us to see the evolution of feathers in birds.
 So, the rachis, or the well-developed central strut,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but rather for regulating temperature and display.
 Researchers have suggested that, although this is the tail of a young dinosaur, the specimen has the feathers of an adult, not a chick's down.
 A car bombing at the main police headquarters in Gaziantep, Turkey, killed two police officers and injured more than 20 others.
 The governor's office said that 19 of the injured were police officers.
 The police have said that the alleged Daesh attacker is suspected of carrying out the attack.
 They found that the sun worked on the same basic principles as other stars,
 The combined luminosity and rotation is used to determine the number of Rossby numbers associated with the plasma flow.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less a star is affected by the reversal of its magnetic field.
 Iwasaki often found himself in unpleasant situations during the voyage.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a mad dog in Tibet, escaped a wedding in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard works on both frequencies, 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz.
 This will ensure backwards compatibility with 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g, provided the base station has a dual receiver.
 802.11n is significantly faster than its predecessors, with a maximum theoretic throughput of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duval, who is married and has two teenage children, did not make a big impression on Miller, who was told the story.
 When Miller was asked for a comment, he said, quote, Mike talks a lot during the hearings . I prepared, so I didn't really listen to what he was saying.
 We will be making efforts to significantly reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020 compared with the 2005 level.
 He did not give a figure for the budget cuts, saying they would be made based on the productivity of China's economy.
 Hu urged developing countries to avoid the old pattern of first polluting and then cleaning up.
 He added, however, that they should not be asked to take on obligations which go beyond their stage of development,
 Today at 12:00 GMT, the Iraq study group presented its report.
 He warns, no one can guarantee that any plan of action in Iraq in the current situation will stop the religious war, the growing violence, or the looming chaos.
 The report opens with a call for open debate and consensus-building in the United States on policy towards the Middle East.
 The report contains a scathing critique of almost every aspect of the current policy of the executive in relation to Iraq and a strong call for an immediate change of course.
 The first of the 78 recommendations is to implement a new diplomatic initiative by the end of this year to strengthen Iraq's borders and to prevent hostile interference, as well as to re-establish diplomatic relations with its neighbours.
 The current Argentine Senator and First Lady, Cristina Fernández de Kirchner, announced her candidacy for the Presidency last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires.
 Mrs . Kirchner announced her intention to run for President at the Argentine theatre, the same place where she had begun her Senate campaign in 2005 as a member of the Buenos Aires province delegation.
 The reason for the debate was the disagreement over the cost of providing material support and rebuilding buildings after Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives jokingly referred to as the New Orleans bailout.
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on the fact that the reconstruction contracts were allegedly given to companies with ties to the government.
 More than four million people traveled to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of people present was so great that not all could get into St . Peter's square, where the funeral was held.
 In various places throughout Rome, large television screens were set up, with which people could watch the ceremony.
 Similar events, which were attended by a large number of people, were organized in many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, in particular, in Poland.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policy of allocating most of its resources to cases that are easily solved, especially car thefts, in order to boost the agency's success rate.
 Congress began funding the initiative in 2005, and the FBI was directed to allocate 10 agents to combat adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored a record number of runs in an innings, 70 runs in just 41 deliveries,
 The middle order batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid performed well and scored a hundred run partnership.
 However, after losing the caliper, captain India made only 36 runs, losing 7 caliper for the completion of innings.
 President George W . Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning his week-long tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore's deputy Prime Minister, Wong Kan Seng, and then discussed trade and terrorism with Singapore's Prime Minister, Lee Hsien Loong.
 A week after the midterm election losses, Bush announced to the public a plan to expand trade with Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed to send the Clean Air Act back to the all-party committee for a second reading after a 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton at the House of Commons on Tuesday.
 At a meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton asked for changes and a complete rewrite of the Conservative Party's environmental legislation.
 Since the Federal Government intervened and took over the financing of the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state government and some members of the Federal Parliament have criticised the move as a political stunt in the lead up to the Federal election, which is due to be held in November.
 But Premier John Howard said it was done only to protect the hospital from a reduction in funding by the Tasmanian government.
 According to the latest tide gauge readings, a tsunami was approaching, and there was clear seismic activity registered near Pago Pago and Niue.
 From Tonga, no reports of serious damage or casualties were received, but there was a temporary power outage that reportedly prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving a tsunami warning from the Pacific Tsunami Warning Centre.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii, located on or near the coast, were closed Wednesday, despite the warnings being lifted.
 The President of the United States, George W . Bush, welcomed the announcement.
 Gordon John Dromad, a Bush spokesman, called the North Korean promise a big step towards the goal of verifiable nuclear disarmament of the Korean peninsula.
 Today, a Subtropical Cyclone Jerry has formed in the Atlantic ocean, this is the tenth named cyclone in this season of Atlantic hurricanes.
 According to the National Hurricane center, at this point, Jerry is not a threat to the United States.
 According to the chief of the U S . Army Corps of engineers, 6 inches of rainfall could have breached the dam.
 The ninth ward, which was flooded 20 feet during Hurricane Katrina, is now underwater, as a nearby levee proved to be insufficiently high to keep the water out.
 Water is being released over a 100-foot width.
 Commons administrator Adam Kerdon expressed his disappointment in the deletions in a conversation with Wikinews last month.
 He's essentially lied to us from the very beginning, acting as though this had to be done for legal reasons,
 The public outcry led to the development of a regulation regarding the content of sexually explicit materials on the site, which hosts millions of openly licensed media.
 The work that has been done is mainly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate observations of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect the team was looking for may be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of the Galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky Way.
 So, the moon pulls on the earth, causing tides, and the Milky way pulls on the Sagittarius A.
 Scientists were able to conclude that dark matter interacts with dark matter just as it does with ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, a significant portion of the dark matter around the Galaxy is in the form of a halo and consists of a large number of small particles.
 In television reports, we are told of a white smoke coming from the factory.
 Local authorities warn residents living near the station to stay indoors, turn off air conditioning and not to drink tap water.
 According to the Japanese nuclear authority, radioactive caesium and iodine were found at the plant.
 Authorities suggest this indicates a possible breach and leakage of uranium fuel containers at the site.
 In the course of research in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal, Dr Tony Moll discovered an extremely drug-resistant form of tuberculosis.
 In an interview, he said the new strain is causing a lot of concern because it leads to a very high death rate.
 Some patients may have been infected in the hospital, thinks Dr Moll, and at least two were health care workers in the hospital.
 In one year, an infected person can infect from 10 to 15 people in close contact.
 However, the percentage of people with multiple drug resistant tuberculosis in a whole group of tuberculosis patients still seems low, 6000 out of a total of 330,000 cases in South Africa at this particular moment.
 The satellites, each of which weighed more than 1,000 pounds and traveled at a speed of about 17,500 miles per hour,
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was very powerful.
 They are still trying to determine how big an impact it will have on the earth.
 The strategic command of the Department of defense is looking for the wreckage.
 The results of the analysis will be posted on a publicly accessible Website.
 The alleged murder charge will be added to the charges of murder in the first degree,
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in blue ash, a suburb of Cincinnati,
 She sent officers to her black Oldsmobile intrigue, which was parked 500 feet away.
 There they found the body of 53-year-old Suresh Balasubramanian, covered in blood-soaked sheets.
 The police said the body had probably been there for about a day.
 The first cases were reported in July.
 The mosquitoes are the vectors, and the disease is then transmitted to humans via the mosquitoes.
 This outbreak prompted the Indian government to take such measures as installing pig traps in severely affected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying pesticides.
 The government also promised several million encephalitis vaccine ampoules, which will help to prepare health care institutions for the next year.
 Plans to deliver vaccines to the historically hardest-hit areas were delayed this year because of a lack of funds and low priority compared to other diseases.
 In 1956, Slaņa moved to Sweden, where he worked for three years as a chief engraver at the Swedish postal company.
 He created more than 1000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His works are so well-known for their quality and detail that he is one of the few "household names" among philatelists, with some specializing only in his works.
 His magnificent thousand-krona 2000-year-old reproduction of the great deeds of the Swedish Kings by David Klcker Ernestrals is entered in the Guinness book of world records.
 In addition, he has been involved in the engraving of banknotes for many countries, including the recent portraits of the Prime Minister on the new Canadian 5 and 100 dollar bills.
 After the accident, Gibson was rushed to the hospital, but he died shortly after.
 The 64-year-old truck driver in the accident was uninjured.
 The car was removed from the scene of the accident at around 12:00 GMT.
 The man who worked in the garage near the accident said,
 All of the people who had been in the area fled from the scene.
 Other issues on the agenda in Bali include the preservation of the world's remaining forests and the exchange of technology to help developing countries grow with less pollution.
 The UN also hopes to complete the creation of a fund to help countries suffering from global warming.
 This money could go towards building houses that are resilient to flooding, using water resources more efficiently and diversifying agricultural crops.
 Flick wrote that attempts to silence women about women's health had been unsuccessful.
 She came to this conclusion based on the many positive comments and support she received from both women and men, who argued that contraceptives should be seen as a medical necessity.
 When the fight was over, after the injured had been taken to the hospital, about 40 more inmates remained in the yard and refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to correct the situation, but the demands of the inmates are unclear.
 Between 10:00 and 11:00 p.m. mountain time, the inmates started a fire in the yard.
 Soon, the guards in protective gear passed through the courtyard and herded the inmates into a corner, using tear gas.
 The firefighters were able to put out the fire by 23:35.
 After the dam was built in 1963, the seasonal floods that spread sediment down the river stopped.
 This sediment was required to form beaches and sandbars, which were the habitat of wild animals.
 This has led to two species of fish becoming extinct, and two others, including the endangered bullhead, being threatened.
 Despite the fact that the floodwaters will only rise a few feet, authorities hope this will be enough to restore the eroded sandbars below.
 There were no tsunami warnings and, according to the Jakarta Geophysical Agency, there will be no tsunami, as the earthquake's magnitude was less than 6.5.
 Despite the lack of a tsunami threat, residents began to panic and evacuate the premises of their companies and their homes.
 Although Winifred was ready to cry during the farewell, she gave her fans a hint that she would be back.
 This is not a farewell. This is the closing of one chapter and the opening of a new one.
 The final results of Namibia's presidential and parliamentary elections saw the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, re-elected with a large majority.
 The ruling South West African People's Organisation also retained its majority in the parliamentary elections.
 The coalition and Afghan forces moved into the area to secure the site, and another coalition aircraft was sent to provide support.
 The fall occurred in high terrain, and is believed to have been the result of enemy fire.
 Attempts to search for the wreckage have been hampered by bad weather and difficult terrain.
 The medical charity, Mango, Doctors without Borders, and the World Health Organisation have all said it is the worst outbreak in the country's history.
 The representative of Doctors Without Borders, Richard Virman, said, quote, Angola is heading towards its worst outbreak ever, and the situation in Angola remains very, very bad.
 The matches began at 10:00 a.m. in perfect weather, and if not for the morning shower, which passed quickly, it was an ideal day for Rugby Sevens.
 Favourites of the tournament from South Africa started with a bang, winning 26-00 against Zambia, who are ranked 5th.
 Looking distinctly worse against their Southern sisters, South Africa did gradually improve their performance as the tournament progressed.
 They were distinguished by disciplined defense, mastery of the ball, and superior teamwork, and it was clear that it would not be easy to beat this team.
 Officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank House say the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a public danger because of the immediate risk of it falling.
 Soon, officers equipped with riot gear entered the yard and cornered the inmates with tear gas.
 The diameter of all the entrances to the cave, which have been named the Seven Sisters, is at least 100 to 250 meters.
 According to infrared images of the night and daytime temperatures, it is likely that these are caves.
 In the daytime they are colder than the surrounding surface, and at night warmer.
 Their thermal characteristics are not as stable as the large caves on earth, which often maintain a nearly constant temperature, but they correspond to what are deep pits in the ground, said Glen Kushnick, a geologist with the planetary geology division of the U S . Geological survey and the University of North Arizona, located in Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, voting is traditionally done by low-tech methods: the voter closes himself in a booth and puts a preprinted paper, indicating the candidate he or she has chosen, into an envelope.
 After the officials verify the voter's identity, he or she drops the envelope into the ballot box and signs the list of voters.
 French laws on elections are quite systematic.
 Starting in 1988, the ballot boxes were to be transparent so that voters and observers could see that no envelopes were added to the ballot box before the start of the voting, and that no envelopes were added to the ballot box after the start of the voting.
 Candidates can send their representatives to watch the whole process, and the votes are counted by volunteers under strict supervision.
 The Eee PC series, previously introduced worldwide with a focus on cost-saving and functionality, became a hot topic during the month-long information technology exhibition in Taipei in 2007.
 But the consumer notebook market will change dramatically after ASUS won the Taiwan Excellence Award in 2007.
 The Website describes the show as a traditional radio play with a new and outrageously deranged vision.
 In the early days of its existence, this show was only broadcast on the site of the long-running Online radio show TogiNet Radio, which featured radio talk shows.
 In late 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary radio station.
 Initially, the show was voiced by amateur actors from East Texas.
 According to reports, the looting continued all night, as there were no law enforcement officers on the streets of Bishkek.
 Bishkek was described by one observer as sinking into anarchy, as groups of people ran through the streets and looted shops.
 Some of the residents of Bishkek blamed the protesters from the South for lawlessness.
 South Africa defeated New Zealand in the Rugby Union Tri Nations match at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was a one-point victory, 21 to 20, ending the All Blacks' winning streak at 15.
 For the springboks, it ended a five-match losing streak.
 This match was the last for the all-blacks, who had won the cup two weeks earlier.
 The final of the season will be held at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week, when the Springboks will play Australia.
 A moderate earthquake struck Monday in the western part of Montana at 10:08 p.m.
 The us Geological survey and its National earthquake information service received no urgent reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was approximately 20 km (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) southeast of Butte.
 It was confirmed that the H5N1 strain of bird flu, which is deadly to humans, was found in a dead wild duck that was discovered Monday on a marsh near Leon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh EU country to be hit by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Cases with suspected H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chamber's lawsuit alleged that God had been responsible for the spread of death, destruction, and terror to millions of people.
 Agnostic Chambre's claim that his suit is not serious and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The story, told in a French opera by Camille Saint-Saens, is about a painter whose life is ruled by a love of drugs and Japan.
 As a result, actors smoke joints on stage, and the theatre itself encourages the audience to join in.
 Former Speaker of the House Newt Gingrich, Texas governor Rick Perry, and Congresswoman Michele Bachmann took fourth, fifth, and sixth places respectively.
 After the results were made public, Gingrich praised Santorum, but harshly criticized Romney, from whose campaign Santorum had been a delegate.
 Perry said he would return to Texas to assess the results of today's party meeting and determine whether he should continue the race, but later said he would.
 Bachman, who had won a straw poll in the August Ames, Iowa, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan Usc medical center at the University of California, Los Angeles, where he subsequently died.
 He was reported to be between the ages of twenty and thirty, and said in a statement, quote,
 The TMZ news and entertainment Website alleges that the photographer stopped his car on the opposite side of Sepulveda Boulevard and attempted to take pictures of the police stopping traffic, before he crossed the road and continued.
 According to police, the driver of the car that hit the photographer will likely not be charged.
 Given that in a day, only eighteen medals could be won, a number of countries failed to make it onto the podium.
 Including the Netherlands with Anna Jochemsen, who finished ninth yesterday in the women's super-G, and Finland with Katja Saari, who finished tenth in the same event.
 Australia's Mitchell Gourlay finished eleventh in the men's standing Super-G. Czech Ondrej Elinek finished sixteenth in the men's standing Super-G.
 Arlene Velasquez from Mexico finished fifteenth among the men in the super-giant in the sitting position.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and sportscaster Anna Ogarynska finished thirteenth in the super-giant.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the earthquake in 2010 are accused of spreading the disease, which began near their military camp.
 The suit alleges that the waste from the UN camp did not undergo proper sanitary treatment, and that bacteria from the waste ended up in the Arti Boni River, one of the largest in Haiti.
 The state of Haiti had not faced any problems related to this disease since the beginning of the nineteenth century.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited an independent study which suggests that the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion inadvertently brought the disease to Haiti.
 Daniel Lantian, a UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was likely caused by peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patient had been admitted to Howard University hospital in a stable condition.
 The patient had visited Nigeria, where a number of Ebola cases have been detected.
 The hospital followed infection control protocols, including the separation of the patient to prevent the spread of infection to other patients.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon worked on a variety of shows,
 In the 1980s, he worked on such shows as Taxi, the late show with David Letterman, and the Tracy Ullman show.
 In 1989, he helped create the Simpsons with Brooks and Groening, and was responsible for the first team of Simpsons writers.
 Despite leaving the show in 1993, he remained the executive producer and every season still received tens of millions of dollars.
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua reported that the plane had been hijacked.
 The plane was reportedly diverted to Kandahar after a bomb threat.
 In early reports, it was stated that the aircraft had returned to Afghanistan after being denied an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Airplane crashes are common in Iran, where the aging air fleet is poorly maintained for both civilian and military operations.
 International sanctions have made it impossible to buy new airplanes.
 Earlier this week, three people were killed and three more injured when a police helicopter crashed.
 In the past year, Iran experienced the worst airplane disaster in years, when a flight to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 people on board.
 In the same month, another airliner skidded off the runway in Mashhad and crashed into a wall, killing seventeen people.
 The Aerosmith tour was canceled.
 The band was scheduled to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 They had to cancel the tour after Steve Tyler, the lead singer, injured his foot during a concert on August 5.
 Murray won the first set in a tie-break after both men had been able to return absolutely every shot.
 Del Potro had an early break in the second set, but it also required a tie-break after reaching 6-6.
 At the time, Poitras was able to get medical help for his shoulder and was able to return to playing.
 The program began at 8:30 PM local time, or 15:00 UTC.
 Famous singers from all over the country performed bhajans or songs of devotion at the feet of Sri Shyam.
 The evening began with a performance by singer Sandhya Sharma, followed by Jay Shankar Chaudhary.
 Then Lakha Singh took over the leadership in singing bhajans.
 Babaji and his disciples were served 108 chapattis, or 56 different kinds of food, including sweets, fruits, nuts, and other dishes.
 Lakkha Singh performed the Chhap pan bhog bhajan.
 Nintendo president Satoru Iwata presented the design of the new Nintendo Revolution game console at the main presentation of the Tokyo game show on Thursday.
 In the Controller, which looks like a television remote, there are two sensors, one on each side of the television,
 By moving the device in the air, players will be able to control actions and movements in video games.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and retired shortly after the start.
 His teammate, Fernando Alonso, was the leader of the race until he pitted for a pit stop, probably because of a badly worn right front tire.
 Michael Schumacher finished the race shortly after Alonso, due to a suspension damage sustained during multiple attempts at overtaking.
 She is very pretty and a very good singer, he said, referring to the transcript of the press conference.
 I was completely and sincerely touched every time we rehearsed it.
 Approximately 3 minutes after launch, the onboard camera showed multiple pieces of insulation foam breaking away from the fuel tank.
 However, it is suggested that they did not cause any damage to the shuttle.
 The head of NASA's shuttle program, N . Wayne Hale, said the foam had come off after a period of time that caused our concern.
 The wind began to increase in strength a minute before the start of the fireworks, and then it reached a speed of 70 kilometers per hour.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and on my way there were two disabled people in wheelchairs, people just jumped over them and pushed them.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating in a standard mode.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no aftershocks and said reactors 1 and 2 at its Shika nuclear power plant had been shut down.
 About 9,400 homes in the region are reported to be without water and about 100 without electricity.
 Some roads are damaged, and the railway and airport in Ishikawa Prefecture are still closed.
 One of the bombs exploded near the governor-general's office.
 Three more bombs went off in the space of two hours,
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight, and official reports confirm that up to 30 people were injured, but the final death toll is still unknown.
 In the urine of animals that had eaten contaminated food, both cyanide and melamine were found.
 Researchers at the University reported that these two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block the functioning of the kidneys.
 During the observations, researchers discovered crystalline formations arising in cat urine when cyanuric acid and melamine are added.
 During a comparison using infrared Fourier spectroscopy, it was found that the composition of these crystals corresponded to crystals found in the urine of affected domestic animals.
 I don't know if you're aware or not, but a large percentage of the goods from Central America were brought into this country duty-free.
 Nevertheless, eighty percent of our goods were taxed according to the tariffs of the Central American countries.
 This seemed to me to be unjust, and of course it was not fair.
 I tell people, you're going to be treated the way you treat other people.
 Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a law banning the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 The law requires that computer games with violence be sold in California with a sticker that says,
 Today, the Attorney-General, Kier Starmer, a titan of the British legal world,
 Hughes resigned, and a member of Parliament, Ed Davey, is expected to replace him as Minister of State for business.
 Hugh and Price are due to appear in Westminster magistrates' court on February 16.
 Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Caddebec, 21, were killed.
 Edgar Vega was injured in the hand and the jaw, while Christopher Schneider needed reconstructive surgery on his face.
 The weapon of Uki broke when it was aimed at the head of the fifth man,
 Schneider gave his testimony via Video-Link from the U S . Air Force base at his home.
 In addition to Wednesday's competition, Carpendale took part in two individual events at the championships.
 Her first event was a slalom, in which she did not finish the first run, and 36 of the 116 competitors had the same result.
 In the other race, a giant slalom, she finished tenth among the women in a combined time of 4:41.30, which was 2:11.60 minutes slower than the Austrian winner, Claudia Leitner, and 1:09.02 minutes slower than the Hungarian, Diengyi Dancs.
 Four of the women in the women's sitting group failed to finish, and 45 of the 117 women in the giant slalom failed to finish.
 The Madhya Pradesh police returned the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 The assistant general inspector D. K. Arya said, we arrested five men who had raped the Swiss woman, and we returned her mobile phone and laptop.
 The accused have been identified as Babu Kandhar, Bhu Te Kandhar, Ram Prasad Kandhar and Vishnu Kandhar.
 The chief of police, Chandra Shekhar, said the accused were presented before the magistrates with their faces covered.
 Although three people were inside the building at the time of the car crash, no one was injured.
 However, the driver suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services freed the driver of the red Audi TT.
 He was initially hospitalised at the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 The Edinburgh sheriff court later brought a charge of murder against Adekoye.
 She is in custody awaiting charges and a trial, but any witness testimony could be tainted because of her celebrity.
 This is a common practice in other parts of the UK, but Scottish law operates differently, and the courts found publication of the photographs to be potentially damaging.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee notes that, quote,
 The Royal Prosecutor's office, which is generally responsible for prosecuting, told reporters that no further comments would be made until the sentencing.
 The document, according to the leak, will address the dispute over borders that Palestine wants to establish based on those that existed before the Six-Day war of 1967.
 Other topics reportedly discussed include the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both peoples, and the future of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel requires a permanent military presence in the valley for ten years after the signing of the agreement, while the PNA is willing to accept only five years.
 The needles involved in the additional pest control test had to be under the close supervision of the rangers, as this test was being monitored and evaluated.
 In partnership with the New South Wales Department of sport and recreation, the New South Wales shooting Association,
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting director of conservation and heritage at the Department of wildlife and national parks, the four selected for the first shooting operation had undergone a comprehensive training and safety briefing.
 Yesterday, Martey laid out the new interim electoral council, consisting of nine participants.
 This is the fifth Cepp Martinez award in four years.
 In the past month, the Presidential Commission recommended that the previous Temporary Election Council resign as part of a package of measures to move the country towards new elections.
 The Commission became Maratelli's response to the mass protests against the state regime that began in October.
 These sometimes violent protests were triggered by the failure to hold elections, some of which were scheduled to take place as early as 2011.
 There were about 60 cases of iPod overheating, resulting in six fires and four people suffering minor burns.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry of Japan stated that it had been informed of 27 cases involving these devices.
 The Ministry of Economy, Labour and Industry announced last week that Apple had informed it of 34 additional cases of overheating, which the company called non-serious.
 In response, the Ministry of Commerce called the delay in reporting the data to Apple a "very unfortunate"
 At 07:19 a M, local time,
 The North Carolina Department of emergency management said there were no reports of damage in the state.
 The Pacific Tsunami warning center also said there were no signs of a tsunami.
 A former Filipino police officer hijacked a tourist bus in Manila, the Philippines' capital, and took Hong Kong tourists hostage.
 Rolando Mendoza shot tourists with his M16 rifle.
 Several hostages were rescued, and at least six were confirmed dead at the time.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released earlier, as were the Filipino photographers.
 Later, photographers took the place of the elderly woman, as she had gone to the toilet, and Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins went on to follow in his father's footsteps and began a career in medicine.
 He trained as a gynaecologist and began working at the National women's hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 When Liggins worked at the hospital, he began to investigate cases of premature birth.
 His research showed that if you injected the hormone, it would speed up the maturation of the baby's lungs during pregnancy.
 As reported by Xinhua, on Wednesday, state investigators discovered two black boxes or, as they are also called, the flight data and cockpit voice recorders.
 Fellow wrestlers also paid tribute to the moon.
 Here's what Tommy Dormer said: The moon became the first extreme queen.
 Dustin Goldast Rannells said, the moon was as chumy as I was.
 Of the 1,400 people surveyed in the lead up to the Federal election in 2010, the number of those who opposed Australia becoming a Republic rose by 8 per cent from 2008.
 The acting Prime Minister, Julia Gillard, during the 2010 Federal election campaign, stated that Australia should become a Republic after the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 Thirty four percent of those surveyed agree with this view and want Queen Elizabeth II to be the last monarch of Australia.
 The survey found that 29 percent of respondents believed Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible, while 31 percent believed it did not need to.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to compete in the 100 and 200m freestyle and three relay events at the Commonwealth Games, but his fitness is now in doubt.
 He was unable to take the medication he needed to ease his pain because it was banned in the Olympics.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and professor of computer science at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest prime number known today on January twenty five.
 On Tuesday, it was announced that by the beginning of February, several people had confirmed this discovery using various hardware and software.
 Perhaps comets were the source of water on earth, and also the source of organic compounds that could form proteins and support life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how the earth was formed, as comets have been hitting the earth for a very long time.
 53-year-old Cuomo began his term as governor earlier this year and signed a bill legalizing same-sex marriage last month.
 He called the rumors political gossip and nonsense.
 He is expected to run for President in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that the Federal Aviation Administration of the United States has claimed will allow planes to fly shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel each year, while also reducing carbon emissions.
 It uses satellite technology instead of the old technology based on ground-based radar, which will allow air traffic controllers to determine the position of aircraft more accurately and to give pilots more accurate information.
 No additional transport has been brought to the ground, there will be no stopping of surface trains, and there will be no parking or pick-up points.
 Fears about the lack of transportation led to speculation that the game might have to be played behind closed doors without fans.
 In a description of the research published Thursday in the Journal Science, it is said that a new species of bird has emerged on the Ecuadorian Galapagos Islands.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the USA and Uppsala University in Sweden have reported that, due to the mating of the endemic Darwin's finch Geospiza fortes with the introduced cactus finch Geospiza conirostris, a new species evolved in just two generations, although it was thought that this process would take much longer.
 Gold can be given any shape. It can be cast into very small forms.
 It can be stretched into a thin wire, which can be twisted and wound into a coil.
 It can be made very thin and attached to another metal, it can be made so thin that sometimes it was used to decorate hand-painted illustrations in books, a so-called illuminated manuscript.
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make an indicator by using the juice of red cabbage.
 The color of the juice changes depending on how acidic or alkaline the chemical is.
 The pH value is determined by the degree of saturation of the hydrogen ions in a given chemical compound.
 Ions are atoms that have had electrons pulled away from them, leaving protons.
 Mix two dry ingredients in one bowl, and then use your clean, damp hands to form a ball out of the mixture.
 The moisture on your hands will react with the top layer, which will be unusual, then a kind of a skin will form.
 In almost every house of Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro there was a toilet with a flush, connected to a complex sewage system.
 The preserved fragments of the sewage systems were discovered in the houses of the Minoan cities on the Islands of Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 Toilets were also in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China, and in the Roman civilization, toilets were sometimes part of public baths, where men and women would bathe together.
 When you call someone thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and almost instantly reflects it back down to the ground.
 The satellite was delivered to space by a rocket, and scientists use telescopes in space because the atmosphere of the earth somewhat distorts our light and our view.
 For a satellite or telescope to be launched into space, a giant rocket is needed,
 The wheel has changed our world in so many ways, the most important being that it has made transportation much easier and faster.
 It gave us the railroad, the automobile, and many other means of transportation.
 Underneath them are a greater number of medium-sized cats, which eat prey of a moderate size, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 And finally, many small cats, including the house cat, eat and hunt much smaller animals, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The secret of their success is the niche concept, a special job that each kind of cat performs, which keeps it from competing with others.
 Lions are the most social cats, living in large groups called prides.
 The herd consists of one to three adult males, related to each other, and also of females and their young, the number of which may amount to thirty.
 The females usually are related and form a large family of sisters and daughters.
 Lions behave in a way that is very similar to wolves or dogs,
 Being a well-rounded athlete, the tiger can climb trees, although not very well, swim, jump great distances, and pull with the strength of five men.
 Tigers belong to the same family as lions, leopards, and jaguars, the big cats.
 A tiger's roar is not like a full-throated lion's roar, but more like a full-throated lion's roar.
 Ocelots love to eat small animals, and if given the chance, they will hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Scientists believe that the ocelots follow the scent of an animal's movements, tracking it by smell as it travels across the ground.
 They are able to see in the dark using nocturnal vision and to move almost unnoticed,
 When a small group of living organisms, a small population, separates from the main population from which they originated,
 This new environment has other resources and other competitors, so the new population will need other characteristics or changes compared to what it had before in order to become a strong competitor.
 The original population has not changed at all, it still needs the same adaptations as it did before.
 Over time, as a new population begins to adapt to a new environment, it begins to look less and less like the rest of the population.
 Over time, through thousands or even millions of years, these two populations will look so different that it will be impossible to tell which is which.
 We call this process the formation of species, that is, the emergence of new species.
 Plants produce oxygen, which humans breathe, and absorb carbon dioxide, which humans exhale.
 Plants get their energy from the sun by using photosynthesis, and they also shade the ground.
 We build our houses and make our clothes from plants, and most of our food comes from plants.
 The Mosasaurus was the most fearsome predator of its time, so it feared no one but other Mosasauruses.
 His long jaws were lined with more than 70 sharp teeth, and he had an additional row of teeth on his palate, so that there was no escape for those who encountered him.
 We don't know for sure, but it's possible that his tongue was split in two, and he ate turtles, large fish, and maybe even other mosasaurs.
 He also attacked anything that came into the water, even a giant dinosaur like Tyrannosaurus.
 Despite the fact that most of their food would be familiar to us, the Romans did have some strange and unusual dishes, served at feasts.
 There was another difference, too: while the poor people and women ate sitting on chairs, the rich liked to have joint feasts,
 The diet of the ancient Romans could not have included foods that came to Europe from the Americas or Asia in later centuries.
 In particular, they had no corn, no tomatoes, no potatoes, no cacao, and no ancient Roman had ever tasted Indian corn.
 The Babylonians built each of their gods a main temple, which was considered the residence of the deity.
 People made sacrifices to the gods, and priests tried to please the gods' desires at ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and an inner sanctum, which only the priests could enter.
 Sometimes, as elements of the temple, they built special towers in the form of pyramids called zikkurats.
 The top of the tower represented a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, home life had little significance.
 The majority of Jewish life took place outdoors.
 Women prepared food in the yard, and shops were open-air stalls that faced the street.
 There were no great forests on the land of Canaan, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated, and in the Scandinavian sagas it is told that Erik the Red was driven out of Iceland for murder and, pushing on further west, he discovered Greenland and gave it its name.
 But regardless of his discovery, the Eskimos had been living there for centuries.
 Although each of the three countries was Scandinavian, there were many differences between the peoples, rulers, traditions, and histories of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you watched the movie National Treasure, you might think that the Declaration of Independence featured a map of treasure.
 However, this is not true. Although something is written on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the reverse side of the Declaration of independence it says, in the bottom,
 Though no one knows for certain who wrote it, it is known that at the beginning of its existence this large parchment document, which measures 29¾ by 24½ inches, was rolled up for more convenient storage.
 And so it's likely that the recording was added as a sort of a marker.
 In the aftermath of the operation, the Allies liberated northern France, but the South remained under German occupation.
 He was under the control of the Vichy French, who had made peace with the Germans in 1940 and worked with the invaders instead of resisting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France, and the invasion was called the Battle of Southern France.
 In just two weeks, the Free French and Americans liberated Southern France and headed towards Germany.
 Civilization is a culture shared by a large group of people who live and work together, a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, which means citizen, and is related to the Latin words civis, meaning citizen, and civitas, meaning city or city-state.
 Cities-States are the precursors of nations, Civic culture implies a transmission of knowledge through several generations, a continuous cultural presence, and a continuing cultural presence.
 Small cultures often disappear without leaving a corresponding historical record, and therefore cannot be recognized as genuine civilizations.
 During the war of independence, thirteen States, in accordance with the articles of Confederation, formed a weak central government, the only body of which was the Congress.
 Congress had no power to levy taxes, and since there was no national executive or judicial authority, it relied on the powers of the state governments, which often refused to cooperate and to enforce its acts.
 He also had no power to repeal state tax laws and tariffs.
 To make amendments, according to the articles, required the unanimous approval of all the states, but the states so irresponsibly neglected to attend the central government that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian football team, along with the German team, is the second most successful team in the world, having won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, Rugby, cycling, ice hockey, and Formula One auto racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions of Italy, and people from these regions participate in international competitions and the Olympics.
 In Japan, there are approximately 7,000 Islands, the largest of which is Honshu, making Japan the 7th largest Island in the world.
 In terms of geography, Japan is often referred to as an archipelago.
 Taiwan's history dates back many years, to the fifteenth century, when European sailors passing by recorded the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, or beautiful island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India company established a base on the southwest of Taiwan, initiating a transformation of aboriginal rice and sugar production methods, and hiring Chinese workers to work on their rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the forces of the Qing dynasty (1644-1912) took control of the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan and in 1885, declared Taiwan a province of the Qing empire.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the Sino-Japanese war,
 Machu Picchu consists of three main structures, namely, the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun, and the Room of the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings at the edges of the complex have been reconstructed to give tourists a more accurate idea of how they originally looked.
 By 1976, 30% of Machu Picchu had been restored, and restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the most common format for static photographs is 35 mm, and this is the dominant size of film on the cusp of the analogue era.
 Today it's still made, but more importantly, it's the aspect ratio of Digital camera images.
 The thirty five millimeter format is actually somewhat confusing, it has a width of thirty six millimeters and a height of twenty four millimeters.
 The ratio of the two sides of this format, divided by twelve to get a ratio with small integers, is therefore accepted as 3:2.
 Many common formats, such as the APS family, are equal to or close to these proportions.
 The rule of thirds is a rule that is often used and often derided, but it's a simple rule that creates dynamism while still maintaining a certain amount of order in the composition.
 It is best to place the main object at the intersection of the lines dividing the picture into three parts vertically and horizontally.
 During this period of European history, the Catholic Church, which had become rich and powerful, was the object of much attention.
 For more than a thousand years, Christianity united the European states, despite differences in languages and traditions.
 Her all-pervading power has affected everyone from the King to the peasant.
 One of the main Christian principles is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the church's money is there for that purpose.
 The center of church authority based in Rome for over a thousand years, and such a concentration of power and wealth led many to question whether this doctrine was being upheld.
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities, Britain imposed a naval blockade on Germany.
 This strategy proved effective, cutting off vital military and civilian supplies, although this blockade violated widely accepted international laws, as laid out in several international agreements over the past two hundred years.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent ships from entering whole sectors of the ocean, putting even neutral ships at risk.
 As the reaction to this tactic was muted, Germany expected a similar reaction to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 Amongst the majority of citizens and peoples in the 1920s, there were prevailing sentiments such as pacifism and isolation.
 After the horrors of the first World War, governments wanted to avoid a similar situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States and accepted a job offer from Edison in New York City.
 He arrived in the United States with four cents in his pocket, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, who was his boss at the previous job, to Thomas Edison.
 In ancient China, they used a unique way of naming periods of time, each period of China or each family that was in power, was a different dynasty.
 Besides, between the reigns of each dynasty there was disunity and instability.
 During this period, there were fierce military actions between many of the noble people who were fighting for the throne.
 The era of the Three Kingdoms was one of the bloodiest periods in the history of ancient China.
 There are many such social and political effects, such as the adoption of the metric system, the transition from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that a country belongs to the people, not to a single ruler.
 Also, after the revolution, opportunities opened up for all men, which allowed the most ambitious and talented to succeed.
 The same thing applies to the Army, because ranks began to be based on merit, not on birth.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other repressed members of the working class in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was very interested in topics not related to worldly life, and he often visited a cave that became known as the Cave of Hira, on Mount Hirah,
 The cave, which has survived to the present day, gives us a vivid idea of Muhammad's spiritual aspirations.
 The cave is located at the top of a mountain to the North of Mecca and is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 It is very difficult to detect even for someone who knows about it.
 There is nothing visible but a pure, clear sky above and a multitude of surrounding mountains.
 The great pyramid at Giza is the only one of the seven wonders of the world that still exists today.
 The great pyramid was built by the Egyptians in the third century BC and is one of a number of large pyramid-shaped structures built to commemorate a pharaoh.
 The plateau of Giza, or the Necropolis of Giza, in the Egyptian Valley of the Kings, includes several pyramids,
 The great pyramid was created in honor of the pharaoh, Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built in honor of Khufu's wives and relatives.
 The sign for the movement of a comma is a V, and the sign for the movement of a semicolon is a squiggle or a diagonal line.
 The up bow means you should start at the end of the bow and the down bow means you should start at the beginning of the bow.
 The movement of the hammer-head upwards usually produces a softer sound, while the movement of the hammer-head downwards produces a more powerful and more sonorous sound.
 You may draw your own line, but remember that the line is printed for musical reasons, and it is usually best to follow it.
 On October 6, 1789, a mob of women from the marketplace forced the King, his queen, Marie-Antoinette, their two young children,
 They returned to Paris in a carriage, surrounded by a crowd of people who shouted threats at the King and the queen.
 The crowd of people forced the King and the queen to open the windows wide.
 At one point, a member of the crowd waved a Royalist's head, which had been severed in the massacre at Versailles.
 The military expenditure of American imperialism to conquer the Philippines was paid for by the Filipinos themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the American colonial regime in order to pay for the large part of the expenses and interest on the bonds, which were being transferred from the Philippines government through Wall Street banking houses.
 Of course, the super profits derived from the long exploitation of the Filipinos constituted the main source of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, one must understand the context that led to their creation.
 The period in which these events took place is commonly referred to as the High Middle Ages, a period of European history that spanned the eleventh, twelfth, and thirteenth centuries.
 The high Middle Ages succeeded the earlier Middle Ages and preceded the late Middle Ages, which, according to the accepted view, ended around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses a wide range of practical ideas, from technological progress or the technological imperative to a strict point of view that the destinies of humans are driven by a fundamental logic, related to the laws of science and their manifestation in technology.
 Most forms of technological determinism share two broad ideas: that the direction of technological development is virtually impervious to cultural or political influence, and that, in turn, the "effects" of technology on society are driven by its own properties, rather than by society.
 For example, one might say that the automobile is a necessary cause of road development.
 However, the nationwide road network is economically unprofitable only for a small group of vehicles, so new methods of production are being developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 Massive car ownership also leads to an increase in the number of road accidents, which leads to the invention of new methods of treatment in the health care system.
 Romanticism in many ways included cultural determinism, drawn from writers like Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the context of romanticism, geography shaped people, and over time, customs and culture arose that were in harmony with the place of residence of a given society, which were better than arbitrarily imposed laws.
 Like Paris is called the fashion capital of the modern world, so Constantinople was considered the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 His fame as a center of luxury began around 400 A.D. and lasted until about 1100 A.D.
 His status declined during the twelfth century, mainly because the crusaders returned with goods such as silk and spices, which were more valuable than the goods offered at the Byzantine markets.
 At this point, the title of fashion capital shifted from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its peak between the tenth and fourteenth centuries.
 At first, clothing was influenced by the Byzantine culture to the East.
 However, because of the slow communication channels, styles on the West may lag 25 to 30 years.
 Own styles began to develop in Western Europe by the end of the Middle Ages, one of the most important being the use of buttons for fastening clothing.
 Organic farming is a form of agriculture that uses techniques that are environmentally sustainable and do not use synthetic inputs.
 Organic farming is a simple, often organic, system of agriculture, using the seeds of plants that grow in a given ecosystem, together with the use of crop rotation and other relatively simple methods of increasing yields.
 Historically, most farmers have grown food for subsistence, and this is still the case in many developing countries.
 Subcultures unite like-minded people who feel alienated by the standards of society, and allow these people to define themselves.
 There may be differences between subcultures, based on age, nationality, social status, place of residence, and/or gender.
 Characteristics that define a subculture as distinct may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Representatives of a subculture often declare their allegiance through a distinctive and symbolic use of style, including fashion, manners, and slang.
 One of the most common ways of illustrating the importance of socialization is to illustrate a number of unfortunate cases where children, because of lack of proper attention, unfortunate circumstances, or deliberate cruelty,
 Such children are called feral or wild. Some feral children have been isolated by humans, usually their own parents.
 Children living on the streets may have experienced severe forms of violence or trauma before they ran away or were abandoned.
 Some were raised by animals, others were said to have grown up in the wild.
 If a fully-grown child is reared by animals instead of people, the child will exhibit the behavioral tendencies, within the limits of physical limitations,
 While project-based learning should be easier and more engaging, Scaffolding is ahead of many of the other technologies.
 Skill-building is not a method of teaching, but rather a form of assistance to those who are going through a new learning experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 Skaffolding can be virtual and real, in other words, a teacher is a form of Skaffolding, but so is a Screwpile in Microsoft office.
 Virtual scaffolding, which helps in teaching, is built into the software and is designed to remind, explain, and ask questions about procedures that the trainee might otherwise find it too difficult to handle on his own.
 Children are handed over to care for a variety of reasons, from being abandoned to being abused and even blackmailed.
 Children should not be raised in an environment where there is no education, no care, and no education.
 We consider the foster care system to be safe for children.
 Our system of care should provide safe housing, loving caregivers, stable education and reliable health care.
 The foster care system should provide all the necessities that were lacking in the home from which they were removed.
 The Internet combines elements of both mass and interpersonal communication.
 Distinguishing features of the Internet lead to additional scales in terms of approach and use.
 So, for example, the idea that learning and socialization are important motivating factors for Internet use has been suggested.
 Personal involvement and long-term contact were also named by Eimme and McCorquodale as new dimensions of motivation when they studied how people reacted to web sites.
 The use of video recordings has led to important discoveries in the field of interpreting micro expressions,
 In particular, it is argued that one can determine whether a person is lying by correctly interpreting his or her micro expressions.
 In the article, President, Oliver Sacks described how people who are damaged in the brain and cannot understand speech,
 According to his hypothesis, animals, such as dogs, may possess similar abilities to interpret human behaviour.
 Research in the twentieth century has shown that there are two kinds of genetic variability,
 Mutation introduces a new genetic variation, while selection removes it from the set of available variations.
 Segregation and recombination with each generation tune the variations between two pools.
 In the savanna, primates with a digestive system like ours have a hard time getting enough amino acids from the available plant resources.
 More than that, failure to do so will lead to such dire consequences as slowed growth, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 The most readily available plant resources would be nuts, found in leaves and legumes, but they are poorly digested by us, as primates, if not prepared.
 On the contrary, food of animal origin, such as ants, termites, and eggs, is not only easily assimilated but also represents a rich source of proteins,
 Taking all of this into consideration, it is not surprising that our ancestors solved the protein problem in much the same way that chimpanzees do in the savanna.
 Interrupting sleep is the process of deliberately waking during normal sleep and then re-entering it shortly.
 This can be done easily by using a relatively quiet alarm clock to wake you up and not to wake you up completely.
 If you find yourself re-setting the alarm clock in your sleep, then you can try to put it on the other side of the room.
 Other options, which are based on biological rhythms, include taking in large amounts of fluid, such as water or tea, a known diuretic, before bed, which causes the person to wake up to urinate.
 The amount of inner peace a person has is inversely proportional to the amount of tension in his or her body and mind.
 The lower the voltage, the more positive the life force that is present in you.
 Everyone can achieve enlightenment, the only thing that stands in the way is our own tension and negative attitude.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been supplemented with the Mahayana path of love and a variety of Indian yoga techniques.
 The principle of Tibetan Buddhism is very simple it consists of Kundalini-Yoga, meditation, and the way of all-embracing love.
 Kundalini energy in Kundalini yoga is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras, and visualization.
 The heart of Tibetan meditation is the visualization of various deities, which cleanse the energy channels, activate the chakras and bring about enlightenment.
 Germany was a common enemy in World War II, which led to the cooperation of the USSR and the USA.
 Two years after the war ended, the former allies became enemies, and the cold war began.
 It was to last for the next 40 years, and it was a real war, fought using proxy armies, on the battlefields of Africa, Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places.
 By 17 September, the Polish defence had already been broken, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganise along the Romanian bridgehead.
 However, these plans became irrelevant almost overnight when about 800,000 soldiers from the Soviet Red Army formed the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after the occupation of Eastern Poland in violation of the Treaty of Versailles, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other international agreements, bilateral and multilateral.
 The use of ships to transport goods is, by far, the most efficient way of transporting large numbers of people and goods across oceans.
 The work of seamen traditionally has been to ensure that a nation can move its people and goods, while at the same time preventing the enemy from doing the same.
 One of the most noteworthy examples of this was the North Atlantic company,
 At the same time, the German Navy, using its U-Boats, tried to stop this movement.
 If the anti-Hitler coalition had failed, Germany might well have conquered Britain, as well as the rest of Europe.
 Goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 Ancient cultures and tribes began to keep them for themselves, in order to have milk, wool, meat, and fur.
 Domestic goats, as a rule, were kept in herds which wandered over the hills or other places of pasture, which were usually watched by children or adolescents,
 Roads were built in England as early as the sixteenth century.
 Although the roads were only parallel wooden planks, they allowed horses to carry larger loads and at a faster pace than the more rutted roads of the time.
 The ties began to be used quite a long time ago in order to keep the rails in place, but it became clear later that the tracks were more effective with a layer of iron on top.
 This became a common practice, but the iron wheels caused more wear and tear on the wooden wheels of the cars.
 And so, the wooden wheels were replaced with iron, and in 1767, the first rails were made entirely of iron.
 The first known form of transportation was walking, humans began to walk upright two million years ago with the appearance of Homo Erectus.
 For their ape-like ancestors, bipedalism was not so common.
 Bipedal specialisations are found in Australopithecine remains from the 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although, possibly, Sahelanthropus walked on two legs as early as 7 million years ago.
 We can start living more environmentally conscious lives, we can become members of the environmental movement, and we can even become activists to help alleviate some of the future suffering.
 As a rule, it's like treating the symptoms, and if we're not just looking for a temporary fix, then we need to address the root cause.
 It is quite obvious that the world has changed a lot under the influence of scientific and technological progress of mankind, and because of overpopulation and people's extravagant lifestyle, the problems have become much bigger.
 After the adoption by Congress on July fourth, the handwritten draft, signed by the chairman of the Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary, Charles Thomson, was sent a few blocks away to the printing shop of John Dunlap.
 Over the course of the night, 150 to 200 copies were made, now known as the Danloup leaflets.
 The first public reading of this document was made by John Nixon in the yard of the independence hall on July 8.
 On July 6, one copy was sent to George Washington, who on July 9 ordered it to be read to his troops in New York City.
 The 25 Danelaw copies that are currently known are the oldest surviving copies of the document.
 Today, many paleontologists believe that one group of dinosaurs survived and lived on to our day,
 Often they are not considered dinosaurs, because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are still many other dinosaur-like birds.
 They have paws with scales and claws, they lay eggs and walk on two hind legs like a Tyrannosaurus.
 Almost all computers that are used today are based on processing information that is coded in Binary.
 A Binary number can have only one of two values, a one or a zero, and these numbers are called Binary digits, or bits.
 It may be difficult to immediately identify peroral poisoning, symptoms like vomiting are too common to be a quick diagnosis.
 The best sign of internal poisoning may be the presence of an open container with a medicine or toxic household chemical.
 Check the label for specific first aid instructions for this particular poison.
 The term bug is used by entomologists to refer to a group of insects.
 The term comes from the ancient Greek word for bedbugs, a term that refers to the insects' ability to live in close proximity to humans.
 Both the predators and the bedbugs are nesting species, adapted to live in the nest or the home of their host.
 In the United States, approximately 400,000 cases of multiple sclerosis have been diagnosed, making it the leading neurological disease of young and middle-aged people.
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, spinal cord, and optic nerve.
 Research has shown that two women suffer from multiple sclerosis for every man.
 A couple may decide that raising a child is not in their best interest or the best interest of their child.
 These couples may choose to create an adoption plan for their child.
 When a child is adopted, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can adopt the child.
 The main purpose of science is to figure out how the world works, using the scientific method, which is basically the way most scientists do their work.
 He, however, is not the only one. Scientific research also guides experimentation, asking questions and making observations.
 Naturalists and philosophers focused their attention on the ancient texts, and especially on the Bible in the Latin language.
 In all scientific questions, including psychology, the views of Aristotle were adopted.
 As the knowledge of the Greek language deteriorated, the West was cut off from its philosophical and scientific Greek roots.
 Many of the observed rhythms in physiology and behavior are often in large part dependent on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, not just a reaction to external periodic stimuli, are registered in most living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators which will continue to autonomously oscillate for a period of time even in the absence of external stimuli.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the first suggestions that DNA was the genetic material.
 Hersey and Chase implanted their DNA into a bacterium with the help of Phage,
 They conducted two experiments, tagging radioactive phosphorus to the DNA of the phage and radioactive sulfur to the protein of the phage.
 Mutations can cause a wide variety of results, depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the affected stretch of genetic material, and whether the mutated cells are part of the germ line.
 Mutations in the cells of the germ line can only be passed on to the next generation, whereas mutations elsewhere may result in the death of the cell or cancer.
 Natural tourism is interesting to those who like to go on nature trips to enjoy the landscape, including wild animals and plants.
 Among the examples of active recreation at the site are hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks and learning about the ecosystem.
 An example of this is visiting, photographing, and studying orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave small towns in rural areas to go to their place of work, and cars pass by them on their way to a place of work that is located in the same small town.
 In this active transportation system, everyone is connected to the system in some way, and supports it.
 At present, science indicates that a huge hydrocarbon economy has influenced one of the stable states of the biosphere, which has supported the evolution of humanity over the last two million years.
 Everyone is a member of the society and uses the transportation systems,
 In developed countries, you rarely hear such complaints about the quality of water or about falling bridges.
 Why do transportation systems receive so many complaints, why do they break down every day?
 The study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and their interaction with each other is carried out within the framework of a study of transport flows.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study the intensity of traffic because it is impossible to predict the behaviour of a driver with one hundred percent certainty.
 Fortunately, the behaviour of drivers is often systematic, so traffic flows in general have some systematicity and can be approximated by mathematics.
 In order to better represent the transportation flow, we'll set up relationships between three main variables:
 These relationships help in the planning, design, and operation of railroad facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to take to the air, and their ability to fly helped them escape predators, find food and mates.
 Most insects have the ability to fold their wings along their body, which gives them an advantage.
 This provides them with a greater number of secluded places in which to hide from predators.
 Dragonflies and damselflies are the only insects that cannot fold their wings back.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus said that the solar system rotated around the sun.
 Many believed him to be right, but many believed the opposite, that the sun, moon, and stars were all revolving around the earth.
 This seems like a reasonable idea, because we don't feel the earth moving, do we?
 The Amazon River is the second longest and the first largest river on earth, carrying more than eight times the volume of water that the second largest river carries.
 The Amazon is also the largest river in the world, with a width that sometimes reaches six miles.
 As much as twenty percent of the water that flows from the rivers of our planet into the oceans comes from the Amazon.
 The main river of the Amazon is 6,387 kilometers long.
 Despite the fact that the construction of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the size and technical perfection of the pyramids at Giza were never equaled.
 In the new realm of the ancient Egyptians, they admired the monuments created by their predecessors more than a thousand years before.
 The Vatican City is the smallest independent country in the world, with a population of about eight hundred.
 The Vatican uses Italian in its laws and official communications.
 Italian is also the everyday language for most people working in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 All of the Vatican's citizens are Catholics.
 People have known about the basic chemical elements, such as gold, silver and copper, since ancient times, because they are all found in nature in a pure state and are relatively easy to extract with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle believed that everything was made up of a mixture of one or more of the four elements, which were earth, water, air, and fire.
 They were in the same order as the four states of matter: solid, liquid, gas, and plasma, although he also suggested that they were changing into a new state.
 Alloys are essentially a mixture of two or more metals, and remember there are many elements in the periodic table.
 Such elements as calcium and potassium are considered metals, of course, there are also such metals as silver and gold.
 You can also make alloys that contain a small amount of non-metallic elements, such as carbon.
 All of the universe is made up of matter, and all matter is made up of the smallest possible particles, called atoms.
 Atoms are so incredibly tiny that trillions of them could fit into the period at the end of this sentence.
 The pencil became a good friend to many people when it first came out.
 It is sad that when new ways of writing came, the pencil lost its former status and was used less.
 Nowadays, people write messages on the screens of computers, and they never have to deal with a typewriter.
 And it's hard to predict what will happen to the keyboard as more and more new technologies come out.
 The atomic bomb works on the principle that in order for a lot of protons and neutrons to be in one nucleus,
 It's like trying to push a heavy cart up a hill, then the splitting of the nucleus releases some of that energy.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means they tend to decay at low or no impact.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rocks and dust, the outer layer of the moon is called the crust.
 The thickness of the bark is about 70 km under the oceans and 100 km under the continents.
 It is thinner under the moon's seas and thicker under the highlands.
 On the visible side, there may be more lunar seas because the crust is thinner, and lava was easier to rise to the surface.
 Theories of content focus on finding what makes people act or what interests them.
 These theories suggest that humans have certain needs and/or desires that build up inside of us as we mature.
 These theories address what it is that makes particular individuals want to do the things that they do and what it is that makes their environment want to do or not do certain things.
 Two popular theories about content are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory of motivation.
 As a rule, there are two types of behavior when managers start to lead people who were previously their equals.
 It's hard for them to make unpopular decisions, to take disciplinary action, to evaluate the work, to distribute responsibilities and to hold people accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, a person becomes an unrecognizable individual who thinks he or she should change everything the team did and take credit for it.
 And the leader ultimately is responsible for the success or failure of the team.
 This behavior often leads to conflicts between leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams adhere to the same standards of mastery as do the conventional teams, but there are some small differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as a point of contact for their immediate physical group.
 They're usually more autonomous than employees from traditional teams, because their teams may meet according to different time zones, which the local management may not always understand.
 The presence of a real invisible team, Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p. 109, is also a unique component of a virtual team.
 The invisible team is the team of leaders that each participant answers to.
 One of the reasons why organisations go through the painstaking process of creating a self-organising Organisation is to innovate.
 When all the available resources are effectively used in all the functional units of an organization, creativity and ingenuity may be manifested.
 In the end, the organization's work to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new innovative process that will meet the client's interests.
 Before an organization can become innovative, leaders must create a culture of innovation, knowledge sharing, and learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the Continuum approach as a method used to help organizations achieve a higher level of effectiveness.
 Neurobiology gives us the physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of consciousness, and so it narrows the field of study,
 The connection between brain pathology and behavior is used by scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various kinds of injury, trauma, disease, and tumors of the brain affect behavior and cause changes in some mental functions.
 The advent of new technologies allows us to see and explore previously unseen brain structures and processes.
 This provides us with a large amount of data and materials to create simulation models that help us to understand the processes that are going on in our minds.
 Despite the fact that ai is firmly associated with science fiction, it forms a very important direction in computer science, which deals with the behavior and training of machines and the "giving" of intelligence to them.
 Research in ai includes the creation of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Here are some examples of the things that can be done: monitoring, planning and scheduling, reacting to diagnoses and client questions, and also recognizing faces, handwriting and voices.
 Such questions are dealt with in separate disciplines, the aim of which is to solve the problems we encounter in everyday life.
 At present, the ai system is often used in the areas of economics, medicine, engineering, and the military, being embedded in some software applications for home computers and video games.
 Field trips are very important for any class, and teachers often want to take their students to places that are not accessible by bus.
 Technology offers a solution through virtual tours, allowing students to tour museums, visit an aquarium, or enjoy fine art, all while sitting with their class.
 Uploading a virtual tour for all to see is also a great way to refresh your memory of the tour and share your newfound knowledge with future classes.
 For example, every year, Bennett high school in North Carolina creates a Website about their visit to the state capital, and every year, that Website is updated, but the old versions are still accessible, serving as a kind of a memory album.
 Blogs can also improve writing skills of students, although students often begin their Blog using poor grammar and spelling, this usually changes as the audience grows.
 Because students are often the most critical audience, a Blog author will often strive to improve his or her writing in order to avoid criticism.
 By keeping a Blog, students begin to better understand the world around them.
 Blogging is a tool that encourages collaboration and motivates students to extend the learning beyond the traditional school day.
 Proper use of Blogs can give students the opportunity to become more analytical and critical by actively engaging with Internet materials, students can determine their own position in the context of other people's work, and also articulate their own views on specific issues.
 Ottawa is a delightful bilingual capital of Canada with a huge number of art galleries and museums that open up the past and the present of Canada.
 Further to the South is Niagara Falls, and to the North, Muskoka and the surrounding wilderness.
 All of this and more makes Ontario something truly Canadian in the eyes of foreigners.
 The larger areas to the North are sparsely populated, and some of them are virtually uninhabited.
 A surprising comparison of the population in the United States, where there are more African-Americans than there are citizens in Canada.
 East African Islands are in the Indian ocean, off the East Coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is much larger than any other and is a distinctive continent in terms of its wildlife.
 Almost all of the smaller Islands are independent or associated with France and are known as the beautiful Beach resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the region, especially it took root on the Comoros and Mayotte.
 The spread of European influence and colonization began in the fifteenth century, when the Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama opened a route through the Cape of Good Hope from Europe to India.
 To the North, the region is bounded by the Sahel, and to the South and West by the Atlantic Ocean.
 For women: all tourists are advised to say that they are married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It is also helpful to wear a ring, but not one that is too expensive to look at.
 Women should be aware that because of cultural differences, it may seem to them that they are being harassed, followed, touched,
 Firmly refuse men and do not be afraid to stand up for yourself, regardless of cultural differences.
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the tenth century BC, and was used by the Romans, Phoenicians, and the Merenides as a strategic port, called Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it under the name of Kaz-Branca, but abandoned it after the earthquake of 1755.
 Sultan of Morocco rebuilt the city under the name of Ed-Dar-El-Beyda, and the Spanish traders who had created trading posts there, called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting places for shopping in all of Morocco.
 Around the old medina, it is easy to find places where traditional Moroccan goods are sold, such as tajines, pottery, leather goods, hookahs, and a whole assortment of trinkets, but all of this is for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist town on the very eastern edge of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, on the border with Rwanda.
 In 2002, the city of Goma was destroyed by the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's streets, especially the central part.
 Although Goma is a fairly safe place, it is advisable to check information about any trips outside of Goma to understand the current state of the fighting in the North Kivu province.
 This town is also a starting point for the ascent of Mount Nyiragongo, and here you can also see mountain gorillas in the wild at one of the cheapest prices in Africa.
 You can go by mototaxi to Goma, the usual price is 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 In connection with its relative inaccessibility, Timbuktu has become a metaphor for an exotic, far-off land.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor city, but its reputation draws tourists, and it has an airport.
 In 1990, it was added to the world heritage list, but is now under threat from the danger of the desert's sand.
 During the filming of Henry Louis Gates's documentary, the wonder of the African world, one of the most important stops was made here.
 This city is very different from the other cities of the country, as it is predominantly Arabic in character, not African.
 Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa, along the border with Mozambique to the east, and Zimbabwe to the north.
 The park's area is 19,500 square kilometers, and it is divided into 14 different ecozones, each of which is a habitat for a different wild animal.
 It is one of the main tourist attractions of South Africa and is considered to be the flagship among South African National Parks.
 As in all South African national parks, there is a daily conservation fee.
 It may also be advantageous to buy a Wild Card, which allows you to visit South African national parks either selectively or all.
 The territory of Hong Kong was named after the island of Hong Kong, a place that many tourists consider to be the main object of their attention.
 A line of buildings forming the line of the Hong Kong skyline is compared to a glittering bar graph, underlined by the water of Victoria Harbour.
 To see the most picturesque parts of Hong Kong, one should leave the island and head to the coast of the Kowloon Peninsula, which is located opposite.
 The largest part of the urban development of Hong Kong is closely concentrated on the reclaimed land on the northern shore.
 This is the place that British colonizers took for themselves, and if you're looking for evidence of a colonial past, this is a good place to start.
 Sundarbans is the largest mangrove forest, extending 80 kilometers from the coastline in Bangladesh and India.
 Sundarbans has been designated as a UNESCO world heritage site.
 These forests are not just Mangrove swamps, but also include some of the last remaining great jungles that once covered the Gangetic plain.
 Sundarbans covers an area of 3,850 square kilometers, of which about one-third is covered by water or swamp.
 Since 1966, Sundarbans has been a wildlife sanctuary and, according to the available estimates, there are about 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer.
 Buses leave from the intercity bus station, which is across the river, throughout the day, although most of them are heading east and to Jakarta.
 Because intercity buses are often crowded, it is advisable to purchase a ticket several days in advance.
 The majority of the districts are served by small Japanese Coaster buses, which are convenient and reliable.
 The Marshrutka is a quick and convenient way to get to nearby places like Paro (150 Ngultrums) and Punakha (200 Ngultrums).
 The Oyapock bridge is a suspension bridge that spans the Oyapock River and connects the cities of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-Georges-de-l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 These two towers are 83 meters high, and the bridge itself is 378 meters long, with two lanes of traffic 3.5 meters wide.
 The height of the under-stage area is 15 meters. Construction was completed in August 2011, but it was not opened for traffic until March 2017.
 According to the plan, the bridge will be fully operational by September 2017, when Brazilian customs inspection points are expected to be completed.
 The Guarani were the largest indigenous group in the region, which is now occupied by Eastern Paraguay, they lived as semi-nomadic hunter-gatherers, who also practiced some form of natural agriculture.
 The Chaco region served as a home to different groups of local tribes, such as the Guaycuru and the Payaguas, who survived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 In the sixteenth century, Paraguay, which had been called the great province of the East Indies, arose as a result of the collision between the Spanish conquerors and the indigenous groups.
 The Spanish began a period of colonization that lasted three centuries.
 Since the foundation of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has largely managed to preserve much of its identity and its distinctiveness.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best teams and also for having some of the best players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year is held in December at the polo grounds in Las Canitas.
 Smaller tournaments and matches are also available to watch at other times of the year.
 To find out about the polo matches and to buy tickets, go to the Argentine Polo Association's Website.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound, which is equivalent in value to the British pound sterling.
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank on these Islands, which is located in Port Stanley opposite the FIC West store.
 As a rule, British pounds will be accepted everywhere on the Islands, and in Stanley, credit cards and U S . dollars are also commonly accepted.
 Credit cards may not be accepted on remote Islands, although British and American currency may be accepted.
 The currency of the Falkland Islands is almost impossible to exchange outside of the Islands, so exchange your money before you leave.
 Since Montevideo is located south of the equator, there the seasons are reversed,
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics, and in the summer months, the air temperature rises above 30°C.
 Winters can be deceptively cold: the temperature rarely falls below zero, but the combination of wind and humidity creates a feeling of colder weather than what the thermometer indicates.
 There are no particularly wet or dry seasons here,
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people, nature is still wild, so do not feed or disturb the animals.
 Administration of the park warns, do not approach within 100 yards of bears and wolves, and within 25 yards of all other wild animals.
 No matter how docile they may appear, bison, elk, bears and virtually all large animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors get injured because they don't keep the proper distance.
 In addition, remember that bears and other wild animals are attracted to the smell of food, so avoid cooking or wearing any pungent foods, and keep your camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa, located on the island of Upolu, and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The Bay was the site of a notorious naval confrontation in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave the Bay.
 All but one of the ships sank, leaving only the British cruiser, which sank a few days later.
 During the Mau movement, a peaceful gathering in the city led to the assassination of the Supreme chief, Tupua Tamasese Meaole III.
 There are many beaches here, as Auckland is located on the shores of two harbours. The most popular beaches are in three areas.
 The beaches of North Shore, in the North Harbour region, are washed by the Pacific ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 Almost all of these beaches are sandy with safe swimming, and many of them are shaded by trees such as the Poinciana.
 In the central Auckland suburb of Mt Eden, where the Waitemata harbour meets the Mt Eden volcano, Tamaki drive beaches stretch out.
 Sometimes it's a crowded family beach with good shopping along the shore.
 The most popular local beer is called Number One, it has a simple, pleasant and refreshing taste.
 There are many French wines that can be drunk, however, New Zealand and Australian wines can be transported better.
 Local tap water is perfectly safe to drink, but if you're still worried, it's not hard to find bottled water.
 Australians do not understand the idea of a flat white, and they serve espresso, cappuccino, and tea without a high layer of whipped cream.
 Hot chocolate meets Belgian standards, although fruit juices are expensive and of superior quality.
 There are a lot of trips to the Reef all year round, and injuries caused by any of these are rare.
 But still, follow the advice of the authorities, obey all the signs, and pay close attention to safety warnings.
 The Cubomedusa is found near beaches and river mouths north of 1770 from October to April, and sometimes outside of this period.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans, and most sharks are afraid of humans and will swim away.
 The crocodiles do not lead an active life in the ocean, but their main habitat is the estuary of the rivers north of Rockhampton.
 Pre-Booking allows the traveler not to worry about where to stay when they arrive at their destination.
 Tour agents often make deals with specific hotels, but you can book through a tour agent and other forms of accommodation, such as camping sites.
 Travel agents usually sell packages that include breakfast, transfer to and from the airport, or even combined packages that include the flight and accommodation.
 In addition, they may hold your reservation if you need time to think about the offer or to obtain other documents for your destination, such as a visa.
 Any changes or requests need to be sent first to the tour agency, not directly to the hotel.
 At some music festivals, the overwhelming majority of participants sleep right on the festival grounds, and most of them consider this to be a mandatory part of the program.
 If you want to be close to the stage, you need to arrive early to find a spot for camping near the music.
 Remember, even if the music on the main stages has already ended, there may be other areas on the festival grounds where the music is still playing late into the night.
 At some festivals there are special camping zones for families with young children.
 If you are crossing the Baltic Sea in the winter, be aware of the location of your cabin, as the passage through the ice can be quite noisy, and may disturb the most sensitive people.
 Cruises to St . Petersburg include city tours. Cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements.
 Casinos usually make every effort to keep visitors inside as long as possible and to spend as much money as they can.
 In these, a special meal, drinks and entertainment are usually offered to guests to keep them in a good mood and to encourage them to stay.
 In some establishments, free alcohol is offered, but intoxication dulls the wits, and all good gamblers know how important it is to remain sober.
 All who are going to travel in high-altitude areas or over mountain passes should be aware of the possibility of snow, ice or frost.
 On a frozen and snowy road, the friction is low, and you won't be able to drive your car as fast as you would on a regular asphalt road.
 During a blizzard, enough snow can fall in a very short period of time to cause a vehicle to become stuck.
 Visibility may also be limited by snow, sleet, condensation, or ice on the vehicle's windshield.
 On the other hand, weather conditions with snow and ice are normal in many countries, and road traffic continues almost without interruption.
 A safari is probably the biggest draw for tourists in Africa and the main event for many travelers.
 The term safari in everyday usage means a land trip to see the spectacular wildlife of Africa, especially in the savanna.
 Some animals, such as elephants or giraffes, will often approach vehicles, so that even with ordinary equipment, you can get a good view.
 Lions, cheetahs, and leopards are sometimes shy, and you'll see them best through a binocular.
 A walking safari, also called a bushwalk, is a hike of several hours to several days.
 The Paralympic games will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events taking place in different locations around Japan.
 Tokyo will become the only Asian city to host the Olympic games for the second time, after having hosted them in 1964.
 If you have booked flights and accommodation for 2020 before the date was announced, you may be in a bit of a pickle.
 The rules of cancelling orders may differ, but as of the end of March, most of the rules related to the Coronavirus do not apply to the Olympics, which are scheduled for July 2020.
 It is expected that most of the tickets for the events will cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen, with the standard ticket price being around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing wet clothes helps them to dry. Many hotels provide an iron and ironing board, even if they are not in the room.
 If you don't have an iron or you're not a fan of wearing ironed socks, you can try a hair dryer if you have one.
 Do not expose the fabric to high temperatures, which can cause it to shrink or in rare cases, burn.
 There are different ways of water purification, some of which are more effective against particular threats.
 In some places, it takes only a minute to boil, in others, it takes several minutes.
 Filters vary in effectiveness, and in case of doubt, you should consider buying water in sealed bottles from a reputable company.
 Travellers may encounter pests they have not seen in their own native lands.
 Pests can spoil food, cause irritation, or, even worse, cause allergic reactions, release toxins, or transmit infection.
 Infectious diseases, by themselves, or dangerous animals that can cause injury or death to humans are generally not considered pests.
 Duty-Free shopping is the ability to buy goods without taxes and duties at certain points.
 Travellers heading to high-tax countries may sometimes save a significant amount, especially on such items as alcohol and tobacco.
 The section between Point-Marion and Fermont has the most difficult driving conditions on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh Expressway, often passing through isolated, hilly, and wooded terrain.
 If you're not used to riding on rural roads, be on the lookout for steep hills, narrow lanes, and sharp turns.
 The speed limit is much lower than on the previous and subsequent sections, usually 35 to 40 miles per hour,
 However, as strange as it may seem, mobile phone service here is much better than on many other parts of the route, such as in Pennsylvania's Wilds.
 German confectionery is quite good, and in Bavaria it is very plentiful and varied, and resembles the confectionery of their southern neighbour, Austria.
 Fruit cake is common, apple cake is year-round, and apples and pears appear in the summer.
 In German baking, almonds, hazelnuts, and other tree nuts are often used.
 If you want a small, but satisfying, sweet baked confection, try what is called in different regions olaj or ponychki with a filling.
 Carrie is a dish based on herbs and spices, combined with meat or vegetables.
 Depending on the consistency of the liquid, curry can be either a dry or a wet dish.
 In the interior of Pakistan and northern India, yogurt is actively used in curry.
 Indonesian cuisine, having 17,000 Islands to choose from, is a common term used to refer to the wide variety of regional cuisines found throughout the country.
 But without qualification, the term is most commonly used to refer to food from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 The cuisine of Java, today widely available throughout the archipelago, includes a variety of spicy dishes.
 The stirrups are the supports for the rider's legs, hanging from both sides of the saddle.
 They provide the rider with better stability, but can be problematic for safety, as there is a risk of the rider's foot becoming stuck.
 If the horse should throw the rider, but his leg is caught in the stirrup, a running horse may drag him.
 First, most of the mounted men wear boots for riding with a smooth and rather thin sole.
 In addition, separate saddles, especially English ones, are equipped with protective fuses, thanks to which the leather stirrup falls off the saddle if it is pulled back by a falling rider.
 The Coachella Valley is the main destination in Chile for alpinism, and is known as the Yosemite of South America, with a large number of big granite walls and cliffs.
 Above, you can enjoy the stunning mountain scenery, with rock climbers from all over the world creating new routes in its huge potential for alpinism.
 Mountain winter sports, including skiing and snowboarding, are popular activities that involve descending a snow-covered landscape on skis or a snowboard.
 Skiing is the main tourist destination for many skiers, who are sometimes called ski bums.
 The idea of skiing is very old: rock paintings depicting skiers date back to 5000 BC.
 Skiing as a sport dates back at least to the seventeenth century, and in 1861, Norwegians opened the first recreational skiing club in Australia.
 It is also called backcountry, ski touring, or hiking on skis.
 This is usually but not always associated with a climb to the summit and then a descent down the unprepared slopes, as the skiing down the face of a mountain requires a more rigid ski and boot.
 Imagine a ski route as a walking route.
 Under good conditions, you'll be able to cover several times the distance you'd cover walking, but you'll only be able to develop such a speed on a well-groomed and well-maintained trail.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but it has many independent countries, and in ordinary circumstances, travelling through a lot of them would mean applying for visas and going through passport control many times.
 But the Schengen area in this regard functions as a single country.
 You're in the zone, and you can usually cross the border without going through passport control again.
 Similarly, if you have a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for a visa in each of the Schengen countries separately, which will save you time and money, and also avoid the hassle of paperwork.
 There is no universal definition of what constitutes an antique, and some tax authorities define antiques as goods that are over 100 years old.
 In this case, the age limit is less than in Europe, for example.
 Artisanal goods can be defined as antiques, even though they are younger than similar mass-produced items.
 Reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Sami people, and the surrounding culture is important to many other professions.
 Although it is a tradition, not all Saami people have engaged in mass reindeer herding, and they lived by fishing, hunting, and other similar pursuits, using reindeer mainly as pack animals.
 Today, many Saami are employed in modern professions, and tourism is an important source of income in the Saami region of Lapland.
 Although the word Gypsy is widely used, especially among non-Romany, it is often considered offensive because of associations with negative stereotypes and misconceptions about the Romani people.
 If a country you are visiting has travel warnings, it may affect your medical insurance while you are there or your travel insurance.
 You may also wish to consult with other governments, in addition to your own, but their advice is aimed at their own citizens.
 Here's one example: U S . citizens in the Middle East may face situations that Europeans or Arabs cannot.
 In the information reports, only a brief description of the political situation in one country is given.
 The opinions expressed are often superficial, vague and oversimplified in comparison to the widely available more detailed information.
 Adverse weather conditions are a general term for any dangerous weather event that may cause damage, serious social disruption, or human fatalities.
 Adverse weather conditions occur everywhere around the world, and they vary in type depending on the geography, the terrain, and the atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, heavy rains and forest fires are manifestations and effects of severe weather phenomena, such as hurricanes, tornadoes, waterspouts and hurricanes.
 Regional and seasonal hazards include blizzards, snowstorms, and ice and dust storms.
 Travellers are strongly advised to take into account any risks associated with the severe weather in their area, as they may affect any travel plans.
 All who plan to visit a country that may be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 A search on the Internet for the phrase, course in hostile environment, may yield the address of a local company.
 In the course of this lecture, we will be discussing the following topics in much more detail.
 The course usually lasts from two to five days and includes role-playing, a lot of first aid information and sometimes training with a gun.
 Books and magazines that tell about surviving in the wild are common, but publications about war zones are few.
 People planning to have a gender reassignment operation abroad should make sure they have valid documents for the return journey.
 The willingness of governments to issue passports without specifying gender,
 The willingness of foreign governments to fulfil their obligations under these documents is very uneven.
 Security checks at checkpoints also became much more thorough after the events of September 11, 2001.
 Transgender people who are preparing for surgery should not expect to be able to pass through the scanners without their privacy being invaded.
 A reef break is a type of wave that forms when a wave breaks on a reef or other obstruction.
 The reverse flow is concentrated in a few deeper areas, where it may form a rapid current,
 Most deaths occur as a result of exhaustion when trying to return against the current, which may be impossible.
 As soon as you get out of the current, swimming back will be no harder than usual.
 Try to go somewhere where you won't be caught again, or, depending on your skills and whether you've been seen, you may want to wait for rescue.
 The shock of returning to one's native country comes sooner, lasts longer, and may be more severe than the cultural shock.
 Travelers who are easily accustomed to a new culture sometimes find it especially difficult to readapt to their own culture.
 When you return home after living abroad, you adapt to the new culture and lose some of the habits of your native culture.
 When you first went abroad, people were likely to treat you with patience and understanding, knowing that travelers need time to adapt to a new country.
 For people, it may be surprising that patience and understanding are required for travelers returning home.
 The sound and light show at the pyramid is one of the most interesting activities for children in this area.
 The pyramids can be seen in the dark, and you can also see them in silence before the show begins.
 There is always a bustle and noise from tourists and vendors. The history of sound and light is like a book with stories.
 The Sphinx serves as a backdrop and narrator of a long story.
 Scenes show at the pyramids, and different pyramids are illuminated.
 Several countries claim the South Shetland Islands, which are home to more bases than any other Antarctic territory.
 The archipelago is located 120 kilometers from the mainland, with the largest island, King George, and the town of Villa Las Estrellas.
 The others include Livingston Island and Deception, where a submerged caldera of an active volcano forms a spectacular natural harbor.
 The land of Esserts is a region south of the Antarctic Peninsula, washed by the sea of Belingshausen.
 The mountains of this peninsula here merge with the plateau, and then rise again to form the 360-kilometre-long Eelsuart system, divided by the Minneota glacier.
 In the northern part, the Sentineel range, are the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson massif, which reaches a height of 4,892 m and is called Mount Vinson.
 In remote places outside of mobile phone coverage, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 As a rule, a satellite phone is not a replacement for a mobile phone, as you need to be in a direct line of sight with the satellite to make a call.
 It's used in shipping, including pleasure and fast ferries, where there is a need for remote data and voice communication.
 As a rule, you will be able to get additional information about the service by contacting your local telephone service provider.
 The option, which is becoming more and more popular for those who are planning to take an academic year, is to travel and study.
 This is especially popular among high school graduates, allowing them to take a year off before entering university, without jeopardizing their education.
 In many cases, attending a course abroad during the academic leave can actually increase your chances of getting into a top-tier college or university back home.
 As a rule, when entering such educational programs, a fee is charged for tuition.
 Finland is a great place for boating, and in the country of a thousand lakes, there are thousands of Islands on the lakes and in the archipelagoes.
 When exploring archipelagos or visiting lakes, you can get by without a yacht.
 Although the coastal archipelagos and the largest lakes can accommodate any yacht, smaller boats or even a canoe leave quite different impressions.
 Boating is a national pastime in Finland, with one boat for seven or eight people.
 The same is true of Norway, Sweden, and New Zealand, but in other cases it is quite unique.
 Most of the individual Baltic cruises include an extended stop in the Russian city of St Petersburg.
 This means you can spend several full days in this historic city and still have time to get back on the ship.
 If you're just going ashore for a day, you don't need a separate visa.
 In some cruise brochures, Berlin, Germany is featured. As you can see on the map above, Berlin is a landlocked city and a visit to the city is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Flying on a plane can be a scary experience for anyone, regardless of age or social status, especially if it's their first time flying or if they've had a traumatic experience in the past.
 There is nothing to be ashamed of in this, it is no different from the personal dislike and fear of many other things which are common to most people.
 Understanding how an airplane works and what happens during a flight can help overcome the fear that arises from not knowing or from a lack of control.
 Delivery services are well paid for quick delivery. Often, the speed of delivery of commercial documents, goods, or spare parts for urgent repair is very important.
 For some routes, the bigger companies have their own planes, but for other routes and for smaller companies, this was a problem.
 If they were shipping anything as an air cargo, then on some routes the unloading and customs clearance could take several days.
 The only way to get it sorted is to send it as registered baggage, and the airline's regulations don't allow baggage to be sent without a passenger.
 The most obvious way to travel in first or business class is to pay for it,
 However, it is quite expensive, in rough approximation, you'll pay four times as much for business and eleven times as much for first class.
 As a rule, there is no point in even looking for first or business class deals for direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know that there is a certain basic group of passengers who are willing to pay a premium for the privilege of getting somewhere quickly and comfortably.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau, and the official language is Romanian, although Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic that has become a victim of ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the Transnistrian Republic, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any of the United Nations' member states.
 Despite the failure of the political negotiations, economic ties between these two parts of Moldova were restored.
 The main religion in Moldova is the Orthodox Christianity.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of around 3.7 million, the largest port after Istanbul, and a major transportation hub.
 The once ancient city of Smyrna today is a modern, developed and bustling commercial center, located along a huge Bay and surrounded by mountains.
 Broad avenues, buildings with glass facades, modern shopping centers, interspersed with traditional red-tiled roofs,
 From Halldorsvik, there is a view of the nearby island of Esturay, and there is an unusual octagonal church located there.
 On the churchyard, over some of the graves, are interesting marble sculptures of doves.
 It's worth spending half an hour and walking around this unusual village.
 A comparatively short distance to the North, lies the romantic and charming town of Sintra, celebrated by Lord Byron and afterwards made famous throughout the world.
 The Scotturb bus number 403 makes regular trips to Sintra and makes a stop at Cabo Roca.
 North of it, visit the great Mosque of the Virgin of Fatima, a place of worldwide pilgrimage.
 Please remember that you are, in principle, standing on a place of a brotherly grave, and also a place which is inexpressibly important for a great percentage of the earth's inhabitants.
 There are still many men and women alive who survived their time here, but there are even more people whose loved ones were killed here or worked to death, whether they were Jewish or of other nationalities.
 Please treat this place with all the dignity, seriousness, and respect it deserves.
 Do not defile this place by graffitiing or scratching on the objects around.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish, with about half of the population preferring to speak Catalan, while the majority understand it and almost all speak Spanish.
 However, most of the signs are only in Catalan, as it is the first official language.
 Spanish is also widely used in public transport and other public places.
 The usual announcements in the Metro are made only in Catalan, but unplanned disruptions are announced by an automated system in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic, and Japanese.
 Parisians are said to be egotistical, rude and arrogant.
 Perhaps it is just a false stereotype, but the best way to succeed in Paris is to behave in the best way as a well-bred person.
 The unfriendly appearance of the Parisians will vanish at once, if you show a little elementary politeness.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily forested, mostly with beech, spruce, and pine, and represents a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 Thanks to a combination of microclimates, different soils and elevation, it has a particularly wide range of plant communities.
 The terrain is dotted with a variety of different animals and birds.
 Here you can meet rare representatives of fauna, for example, the European Brown bear, wolf, Eagle, Owl, lynx, wild cat and many other common species of animals.
 When visiting monasteries, women should be dressed in skirts that are below the knee and with their shoulders covered.
 In most monasteries, women are given the robe, even if they come unprepared, but if you take your own, especially one of a bright color, the monk or nun will smile at you.
 Similarly, men should wear pants that cover the knees.
 You can also take these at the entrance, however, these are not washed after each use, so it may be uncomfortable for you to wear these in the dressing room.
 Majorcan cuisine, like that of the Mediterranean, is based on vegetables, bread and meat, with olive oil being the most common ingredient.
 A simple and popular lunch dish, especially in the summer, is Pa-Aamboli, which is bread with olive oil, tomatoes, and any available toppings, such as cheese, tuna, and so on.
 All nouns, as well as the word Sie, meaning you, are always capitalized even in the middle of a sentence.
 And the word for door is a verb,
 This also makes it easier to read, while writing becomes somewhat more difficult, as it is necessary to ascertain whether a verb or an adjective is used in the substantivized form.
 The pronunciation in Italian is relatively simple, as most of the words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 One should be especially careful with the letters c and g, as their pronunciation changes depending on the following vowel.
 And remember, r and rr are pronounced differently: caro means dear, and carro means a cart.
 In Persian, the grammar is relatively light and mostly regular.
 Therefore, reading this textbook of Persian grammar will help you to learn many new things and to better understand the expressions.
 Obviously, if you speak a Romance language, it will be easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 However, people who know a little bit of Spanish may hastily conclude that Portuguese is quite similar and can be learned without a lot of extra effort.
 Ancient observatories, as a rule, are today considered to be outdated and serve as museums or educational institutions.
 Since light pollution was not such a problem during their heyday, they are usually located in cities or on campuses, which are easier to get to than those built in our time.
 Most of the modern research telescopes are huge structures in remote locations with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The contemplation of the blooming of the cherry blossom, called Hanami, became a part of Japanese culture in the eighth century.
 This idea came from China, where the favorite flower was the color of a plum.
 In Japan, the first celebrations of the Sakura were held by the Emperor only for himself and other members of the aristocracy at the Imperial court.
 Plants look their best in their natural habitat, so don't be tempted to take even one.
 When visiting an officially organised garden, picking a sample will also get you thrown out without any discussion.
 Singapore is a very safe place, where it's easy to navigate, and practically everything can be bought after arrival.
 But, having been in the "deep tropics" only a few degrees north of the equator, you'll have to cope with both the heat and the sun,
 There are also several buses going North to Hebron, the legendary burial place of the Biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, as well as their wives.
 Make sure the bus you're getting on goes to Hebron, not just to nearby Jewish settlement Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good theme for a holiday.
 For example, a visit to the castles in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, a cruise on the Danube, or a boat ride on the Erie Canal.
 They also identify routes for popular walking and bicycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity, and it is celebrated as the day of Jesus's birth.
 Many of the traditions associated with this holiday have also been adopted by non-Christians in Christian-majority countries.
 There is a tradition of staying up all night on Easter,
 Of course, this tradition has a Christian theological explanation, but it may well be a pre-Christian ritual of spring and fertility.
 More traditional churches often hold Easter services on Saturday evening during the Easter weekend, with the congregation usually beginning the Easter vigil at midnight.
 All the animals that originally arrived on these Islands got here by swimming, flying, or being washed ashore.
 Because of the great distance from the mainland, mammals could not have traveled to the Islands, making the giant tortoise the main herbivore on the Galapagos Islands.
 Since the arrival of humans to the Galapagos Islands, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats, and dogs.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic in the winter, you will experience a polar night, when the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This is a good time to see the northern lights because the sky will be more or less dark all day.
 Since these areas are sparsely populated, and as a result, light pollution is often not a problem, you'll also be able to enjoy the stars.
 Japanese culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners are used to.
 The suits are standard business attire, and colleagues refer to each other by their first and last names.
 Harmony is extremely important at the workplace, and the results of group work are valued above individual achievements.
 Usually, employees must receive the approval of their supervisor before making any decision and must obey the supervisor's orders without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.29700044101471834, 'precisions': [0.6234186525448662, 0.36666520345902287, 0.24204143506821627, 0.16437828202534085], 'brevity_penalty': 0.961747758375381, 'length_ratio': 0.9624610654908782, 'translation_length': 23793, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 56.28278949116601, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8352884165795424, 'scores': [0.7791546583175659, 0.8475973606109619, 0.8513460159301758, 0.738752543926239, 0.767786979675293, 0.7770780920982361, 0.8656514286994934, 0.8930820822715759, 0.9155844449996948, 0.9249377250671387, 0.7660313248634338, 0.841555655002594, 0.9184168577194214, 0.8641592264175415, 0.8391215205192566, 0.7186850309371948, 0.8265336751937866, 0.79242342710495, 0.896419882774353, 0.8360705971717834, 0.9332714676856995, 0.8976007699966431, 0.851918637752533, 0.8587483763694763, 0.8278208374977112, 0.9047990441322327, 0.7894499897956848, 0.8752155900001526, 0.8836511373519897, 0.8885627388954163, 0.4076814651489258, 0.6735965609550476, 0.8180462718009949, 0.8871408700942993, 0.9314393997192383, 0.8351209163665771, 0.7422475218772888, 0.8212529420852661, 0.8586679100990295, 0.8394307494163513, 0.8770319819450378, 0.887971818447113, 0.9145323634147644, 0.9087304472923279, 0.8501113653182983, 0.7633472681045532, 0.8799974322319031, 0.8971586227416992, 0.888096809387207, 0.8253704905509949, 0.9098173975944519, 0.8775848746299744, 0.9031073451042175, 0.8902084231376648, 0.8786566257476807, 0.8728801608085632, 0.8674896955490112, 0.8211892247200012, 0.8724000453948975, 0.9399698376655579, 0.8309937119483948, 0.8890698552131653, 0.8405860066413879, 0.8984265327453613, 0.8563876748085022, 0.7436195611953735, 0.8533341884613037, 0.6539877653121948, 0.925722599029541, 0.8693503141403198, 0.8541716933250427, 0.8529564738273621, 0.8352930545806885, 0.8827434182167053, 0.8278874158859253, 0.8378630876541138, 0.8684605360031128, 0.9230766892433167, 0.9208057522773743, 0.8370418548583984, 0.8213117718696594, 0.8762350678443909, 0.7791581153869629, 0.822875440120697, 0.781836986541748, 0.8837413787841797, 0.765690803527832, 0.8762083053588867, 0.9011478424072266, 0.8713638186454773, 0.7464208006858826, 0.8112807869911194, 0.8564721345901489, 0.8481106162071228, 0.9033928513526917, 0.9241241812705994, 0.8479819893836975, 0.8029443621635437, 0.8513230681419373, 0.8504797220230103, 0.8968005776405334, 0.8344720005989075, 0.7908346056938171, 0.9476808905601501, 0.8462449908256531, 0.715429961681366, 0.8635475635528564, 0.43933865427970886, 0.5264973640441895, 0.711457371711731, 0.8672433495521545, 0.9228307604789734, 0.8575237989425659, 0.8217704892158508, 0.8935537934303284, 0.8716263771057129, 0.890064537525177, 0.867878258228302, 0.9553102254867554, 0.8979112505912781, 0.6498016715049744, 0.8654724955558777, 0.901412308216095, 0.8737370371818542, 0.8550480604171753, 0.5843330025672913, 0.7232718467712402, 0.8701907992362976, 0.8633451461791992, 0.8753166198730469, 0.866050660610199, 0.8773829340934753, 0.8825044631958008, 0.8843143582344055, 0.831058919429779, 0.8314076662063599, 0.8633813261985779, 0.9097298979759216, 0.8793379664421082, 0.8591274619102478, 0.8858969807624817, 0.7983007431030273, 0.8953550457954407, 0.8248366713523865, 0.8834404349327087, 0.8836363554000854, 0.8793599605560303, 0.9100173115730286, 0.8438107371330261, 0.8743625283241272, 0.8541609644889832, 0.8313440680503845, 0.8051421642303467, 0.7897775769233704, 0.8501002192497253, 0.870033323764801, 0.8560312390327454, 0.4774721562862396, 0.8553648591041565, 0.8498696088790894, 0.8877561688423157, 0.788650631904602, 0.8772732615470886, 0.8767196536064148, 0.8300490975379944, 0.7585852742195129, 0.85479736328125, 0.8736692070960999, 0.7613151669502258, 0.7623117566108704, 0.858294665813446, 0.9410962462425232, 0.8709583878517151, 0.8718506693840027, 0.8816512227058411, 0.9173024296760559, 0.820825457572937, 0.9058923721313477, 0.8287732005119324, 0.84357750415802, 0.8896464705467224, 0.906714141368866, 0.7977606654167175, 0.9171430468559265, 0.8684629797935486, 0.9149578809738159, 0.9445075392723083, 0.8101292252540588, 0.5896216034889221, 0.8462377786636353, 0.7191875576972961, 0.9031851887702942, 0.7362706661224365, 0.7403907775878906, 0.7998899817466736, 0.8610802292823792, 0.5114474892616272, 0.7820481657981873, 0.8890522718429565, 0.8286386132240295, 0.8295130133628845, 0.8309282660484314, 0.6490790247917175, 0.6679161190986633, 0.8841925859451294, 0.8518840670585632, 0.8149998188018799, 0.8761096596717834, 0.907103955745697, 0.912666916847229, 0.8981009125709534, 0.8754748702049255, 0.8659214377403259, 0.8418368101119995, 0.8953956961631775, 0.8680570721626282, 0.895268440246582, 0.8574182391166687, 0.8549957871437073, 0.9005383253097534, 0.9074541330337524, 0.9050194621086121, 0.8782417178153992, 0.8822529911994934, 0.6998521685600281, 0.9264876842498779, 0.8662065863609314, 0.8023437857627869, 0.8838435411453247, 0.7592912316322327, 0.9304817914962769, 0.8567991852760315, 0.629551112651825, 0.8901762366294861, 0.7364787459373474, 0.7916598916053772, 0.866959273815155, 0.70207279920578, 0.9071951508522034, 0.8865765929222107, 0.734631359577179, 0.7549929618835449, 0.8325223922729492, 0.8460182547569275, 0.8831278681755066, 0.8873757123947144, 0.818856418132782, 0.6298321485519409, 0.8127694725990295, 0.9015970826148987, 0.8711115717887878, 0.9119187593460083, 0.868574857711792, 0.9254740476608276, 0.8593874573707581, 0.8953797221183777, 0.8379289507865906, 0.8990913033485413, 0.8787953853607178, 0.8252509236335754, 0.9096877574920654, 0.8417065739631653, 0.8242789506912231, 0.7655454874038696, 0.9071721434593201, 0.6920711994171143, 0.48599207401275635, 0.766494870185852, 0.8882906436920166, 0.7655791640281677, 0.8145824074745178, 0.5496744513511658, 0.8375528454780579, 0.8003338575363159, 0.7927114963531494, 0.7758118510246277, 0.7735700011253357, 0.9200019240379333, 0.8552567362785339, 0.8234977722167969, 0.8196696639060974, 0.8416420817375183, 0.925178050994873, 0.909278392791748, 0.9503343105316162, 0.9128156304359436, 0.8019802570343018, 0.8362410664558411, 0.885481595993042, 0.5491394400596619, 0.8537211418151855, 0.8549215197563171, 0.89171302318573, 0.8510124683380127, 0.7524226307868958, 0.5325635075569153, 0.8320091366767883, 0.8090299963951111, 0.7268503308296204, 0.8407379984855652, 0.8874946236610413, 0.8683193325996399, 0.8725536465644836, 0.8541929721832275, 0.8251407742500305, 0.7993078827857971, 0.5282410383224487, 0.8220342993736267, 0.8911628723144531, 0.8886029720306396, 0.8956239819526672, 0.8900510668754578, 0.9158838391304016, 0.7298139929771423, 0.9444486498832703, 0.9028939008712769, 0.8488977551460266, 0.837263822555542, 0.7185333371162415, 0.7604359984397888, 0.5244781970977783, 0.47240254282951355, 0.8806436061859131, 0.8247144818305969, 0.8975244164466858, 0.8166619539260864, 0.8463783264160156, 0.86553555727005, 0.8842988610267639, 0.8523434996604919, 0.8900963664054871, 0.8539621233940125, 0.9158974885940552, 0.8610429167747498, 0.9300795793533325, 0.8738226294517517, 0.8780869245529175, 0.7107933759689331, 0.8820828795433044, 0.8424106240272522, 0.8273195624351501, 0.7356968522071838, 0.7780527472496033, 0.8302352428436279, 0.8938974142074585, 0.8751762509346008, 0.859290599822998, 0.7819147109985352, 0.8225059509277344, 0.7485563158988953, 0.8431394696235657, 0.8477126359939575, 0.8814119696617126, 0.9313384890556335, 0.9066274762153625, 0.8896533846855164, 0.8142391443252563, 0.8478749394416809, 0.8766484260559082, 0.8237002491950989, 0.8365970253944397, 0.8878358006477356, 0.951366662979126, 0.8120715022087097, 0.8742323517799377, 0.6931281089782715, 0.8023422956466675, 0.7396921515464783, 0.5679266452789307, 0.7760252356529236, 0.7047327160835266, 0.5736874938011169, 0.6296705007553101, 0.879047691822052, 0.9126005172729492, 0.9177073240280151, 0.8438834547996521, 0.7564982175827026, 0.860805332660675, 0.8564239144325256, 0.847109854221344, 0.8601779341697693, 0.7856333255767822, 0.6982864737510681, 0.8077184557914734, 0.622829020023346, 0.7253847718238831, 0.8939530253410339, 0.8296061754226685, 0.8885700702667236, 0.8803501725196838, 0.9070399403572083, 0.8346751928329468, 0.9256821870803833, 0.8324480652809143, 0.8542570471763611, 0.7010059952735901, 0.9530224204063416, 0.8226891160011292, 0.8880931735038757, 0.9018341898918152, 0.8535687923431396, 0.9211412072181702, 0.6034230589866638, 0.8753163814544678, 0.8134651184082031, 0.8117823600769043, 0.8406136631965637, 0.8645577430725098, 0.8615873456001282, 0.8906392455101013, 0.8642264008522034, 0.7486985325813293, 0.8925109505653381, 0.8664675951004028, 0.8736413717269897, 0.8400000929832458, 0.8041582703590393, 0.8888291716575623, 0.913788914680481, 0.8922667503356934, 0.8654131889343262, 0.821304440498352, 0.822733461856842, 0.8663226962089539, 0.9101170301437378, 0.6115729808807373, 0.9232472777366638, 0.9080719351768494, 0.9336288571357727, 0.8502506613731384, 0.7042561173439026, 0.6799988150596619, 0.7838731408119202, 0.8315091133117676, 0.809108316898346, 0.832374632358551, 0.8812207579612732, 0.8858071565628052, 0.8694494366645813, 0.9015939831733704, 0.882045567035675, 0.9437623620033264, 0.903768002986908, 0.8882268071174622, 0.8499051928520203, 0.8676212430000305, 0.85618656873703, 0.8879634737968445, 0.8580081462860107, 0.8750191926956177, 0.6527944207191467, 0.8882030844688416, 0.7405739426612854, 0.8754727244377136, 0.7773165702819824, 0.7622655034065247, 0.9194644689559937, 0.7945108413696289, 0.8548488020896912, 0.9070211052894592, 0.6185126900672913, 0.6869990229606628, 0.8924651145935059, 0.844818651676178, 0.7307983040809631, 0.894711971282959, 0.529911994934082, 0.6385095715522766, 0.7347754836082458, 0.7475802302360535, 0.5467925667762756, 0.8556199073791504, 0.7588331699371338, 0.6899098753929138, 0.8916645646095276, 0.8492764234542847, 0.8731338977813721, 0.8954601883888245, 0.8882874846458435, 0.8368344902992249, 0.872861385345459, 0.8604206442832947, 0.8477275967597961, 0.8887045383453369, 0.8670527338981628, 0.885585606098175, 0.8557131886482239, 0.8861478567123413, 0.9082737565040588, 0.8456781506538391, 0.8423054814338684, 0.8953023552894592, 0.7715538740158081, 0.8376757502555847, 0.7826740145683289, 0.5263382196426392, 0.8381966948509216, 0.8812287449836731, 0.8593569397926331, 0.8833714127540588, 0.9426087737083435, 0.900101900100708, 0.8021144270896912, 0.6764072179794312, 0.8429462909698486, 0.843275785446167, 0.6790121793746948, 0.7574771046638489, 0.8485926985740662, 0.7279319167137146, 0.7679235339164734, 0.7916812896728516, 0.6583810448646545, 0.8759644031524658, 0.8757757544517517, 0.8579481244087219, 0.9692941308021545, 0.7563192844390869, 0.8350948691368103, 0.8533636927604675, 0.7898575067520142, 0.8714592456817627, 0.6453471779823303, 0.8813974261283875, 0.8429518342018127, 0.9040433764457703, 0.7758803367614746, 0.8480654358863831, 0.8838075399398804, 0.7724258303642273, 0.802294909954071, 0.8290793299674988, 0.761731743812561, 0.7976966500282288, 0.7914947271347046, 0.8318529725074768, 0.8523405194282532, 0.6888371706008911, 0.9039409756660461, 0.8659386038780212, 0.8826143145561218, 0.8546011447906494, 0.8177032470703125, 0.7963699698448181, 0.908521831035614, 0.8764739632606506, 0.8801035284996033, 0.8386387228965759, 0.9205554127693176, 0.7997057437896729, 0.6160995364189148, 0.8718400001525879, 0.8344460129737854, 0.9202802777290344, 0.8216597437858582, 0.7172620892524719, 0.8892856240272522, 0.8102830052375793, 0.8178784251213074, 0.8493735194206238, 0.8655715584754944, 0.8573024272918701, 0.6290497183799744, 0.852719247341156, 0.8851556181907654, 0.8241155743598938, 0.8822919726371765, 0.8575698137283325, 0.7666109204292297, 0.91727614402771, 0.874154269695282, 0.774497926235199, 0.7134096026420593, 0.8764476776123047, 0.6715507507324219, 0.8344143629074097, 0.825698971748352, 0.8452796936035156, 0.8401257395744324, 0.8936743140220642, 0.9391964077949524, 0.8880135416984558, 0.8076741099357605, 0.8298150897026062, 0.8647715449333191, 0.8593860268592834, 0.6638433337211609, 0.8524588942527771, 0.9293491840362549, 0.8753723502159119, 0.8892752528190613, 0.7383734583854675, 0.9019384980201721, 0.8789054751396179, 0.896170437335968, 0.9055492281913757, 0.882405698299408, 0.8515014052391052, 0.9083002209663391, 0.7955010533332825, 0.8367322087287903, 0.865680992603302, 0.8199461698532104, 0.825801432132721, 0.9062977433204651, 0.8161971569061279, 0.7741296887397766, 0.7241341471672058, 0.799420952796936, 0.7231309413909912, 0.9028028249740601, 0.7935308814048767, 0.8365841507911682, 0.8515275120735168, 0.8265901803970337, 0.7843570113182068, 0.9224187135696411, 0.8789353966712952, 0.8644567131996155, 0.8870742917060852, 0.8092703819274902, 0.9095184206962585, 0.837729811668396, 0.8637552857398987, 0.8856305480003357, 0.9046450257301331, 0.9210938811302185, 0.8080076575279236, 0.8712490200996399, 0.7764715552330017, 0.8418737053871155, 0.9285728335380554, 0.9330634474754333, 0.908955991268158, 0.9050561189651489, 0.9211307168006897, 0.8465146422386169, 0.9085469245910645, 0.9239643216133118, 0.914555013179779, 0.9100260138511658, 0.9356374144554138, 0.9198634028434753, 0.82058185338974, 0.7581402659416199, 0.7804682850837708, 0.8078191876411438, 0.8566386699676514, 0.8658014535903931, 0.9161263108253479, 0.7477269768714905, 0.7830731272697449, 0.8004922270774841, 0.8741472959518433, 0.8846960663795471, 0.8563387393951416, 0.8596178293228149, 0.7181242108345032, 0.7907342314720154, 0.8372966647148132, 0.9007315039634705, 0.9292360544204712, 0.8722957968711853, 0.9549419283866882, 0.8758890628814697, 0.8527601361274719, 0.7286233305931091, 0.7300438284873962, 0.8997606039047241, 0.8496080040931702, 0.9128055572509766, 0.9216340184211731, 0.8168866038322449, 0.8880307078361511, 0.8932722210884094, 0.9015888571739197, 0.8966856598854065, 0.8295758366584778, 0.8697434067726135, 0.8130056858062744, 0.8390522599220276, 0.8585502505302429, 0.8494276404380798, 0.862855851650238, 0.7943063378334045, 0.8631606698036194, 0.8537184596061707, 0.8929851651191711, 0.7008548378944397, 0.9310415387153625, 0.842478334903717, 0.8312774300575256, 0.8084571957588196, 0.8509435057640076, 0.862474262714386, 0.8203239440917969, 0.9188876748085022, 0.8456656336784363, 0.877707302570343, 0.8405393958091736, 0.8646830916404724, 0.9078081250190735, 0.8745433688163757, 0.867828905582428, 0.7198556065559387, 0.6610800623893738, 0.9090800881385803, 0.8572433590888977, 0.8492634296417236, 0.9357656240463257, 0.8561134338378906, 0.8796438574790955, 0.8809712529182434, 0.8671911954879761, 0.7401283383369446, 0.7933288216590881, 0.869990885257721, 0.8878339529037476, 0.8748965859413147, 0.8076918721199036, 0.8415948748588562, 0.8293206691741943, 0.8747805953025818, 0.8899381756782532, 0.9063161015510559, 0.8448734283447266, 0.8607028722763062, 0.7619238495826721, 0.8083842396736145, 0.8453156352043152, 0.9040172696113586, 0.8039852976799011, 0.7234907746315002, 0.8772069215774536, 0.9015194177627563, 0.8842326402664185, 0.7413855791091919, 0.8971502780914307, 0.8612794280052185, 0.7380541563034058, 0.835732638835907, 0.8595097064971924, 0.8623936176300049, 0.9003317952156067, 0.8574351668357849, 0.8886448740959167, 0.8430020809173584, 0.9160754680633545, 0.8888958096504211, 0.8073757290840149, 0.8916626572608948, 0.8817039728164673, 0.8336963057518005, 0.8052154779434204, 0.8989060521125793, 0.8363708853721619, 0.7943889498710632, 0.8727325797080994, 0.7669718861579895, 0.9196450710296631, 0.9172138571739197, 0.760901153087616, 0.8751381039619446, 0.7879307866096497, 0.9071975350379944, 0.7649659514427185, 0.825726330280304, 0.914790689945221, 0.9677184224128723, 0.8850628733634949, 0.6702598333358765, 0.8360040783882141, 0.8924018740653992, 0.8615553975105286, 0.8362331390380859, 0.6479160785675049, 0.7893783450126648, 0.8207845687866211, 0.8033199906349182, 0.8794031143188477, 0.7338612079620361, 0.8785198926925659, 0.8591119050979614, 0.9081311821937561, 0.7201597094535828, 0.9182456731796265, 0.8634171485900879, 0.8204287886619568, 0.8544030785560608, 0.8917638063430786, 0.8696922659873962, 0.8524704575538635, 0.8376598954200745, 0.8669307827949524, 0.8511489033699036, 0.9451596140861511, 0.8134945034980774, 0.8738833665847778, 0.6918435096740723, 0.8320143818855286, 0.8246833682060242, 0.8744646906852722, 0.8288013339042664, 0.8515880107879639, 0.885703980922699, 0.8732972145080566, 0.86628657579422, 0.8684005737304688, 0.8314110636711121, 0.8995772004127502, 0.8259925842285156, 0.8837075233459473, 0.8789977431297302, 0.8497893214225769, 0.8086943030357361, 0.8434489369392395, 0.8494074940681458, 0.8287668228149414, 0.830661952495575, 0.936095654964447, 0.8281285762786865, 0.8887017369270325, 0.8794160485267639, 0.9229605793952942, 0.8591369986534119, 0.8540884852409363, 0.8793639540672302, 0.8925983309745789, 0.8617517352104187, 0.7236080765724182, 0.847756564617157, 0.7941614389419556, 0.7150797843933105, 0.760592520236969, 0.5973054766654968, 0.7734818458557129, 0.8175798654556274, 0.7159799933433533, 0.8654334545135498, 0.8339594006538391, 0.6608416438102722, 0.7993606925010681, 0.8572614192962646, 0.6327667832374573, 0.7608616948127747, 0.7729167938232422, 0.849084198474884, 0.7332826256752014, 0.857389509677887, 0.6669585704803467, 0.9238753318786621, 0.9059397578239441, 0.8442108035087585, 0.6699942350387573, 0.7864453792572021, 0.721818208694458, 0.883573591709137, 0.8675374984741211, 0.8411564826965332, 0.8549827933311462, 0.8856880068778992, 0.7139672040939331, 0.9001269936561584, 0.8543683290481567, 0.8160746693611145, 0.802728533744812, 0.8688095211982727, 0.8374103307723999, 0.8856654763221741, 0.8307839035987854, 0.8068646788597107, 0.9080795049667358, 0.9009544253349304, 0.8752147555351257, 0.8121609091758728, 0.8996829390525818, 0.888419508934021, 0.9435673356056213, 0.7376030683517456, 0.7026131749153137, 0.8993832468986511, 0.9055305123329163, 0.8817102909088135, 0.6698270440101624, 0.8226674795150757, 0.8873231410980225, 0.862663209438324, 0.6653531193733215, 0.7531977295875549, 0.858668327331543, 0.8919165730476379, 0.8329880833625793, 0.7863900661468506, 0.8553341031074524, 0.9031701683998108, 0.8833922743797302, 0.8098832368850708, 0.9160436391830444, 0.9065011143684387, 0.7973847985267639, 0.9011780023574829, 0.8047385215759277, 0.7039079070091248, 0.8575491309165955, 0.8706315755844116, 0.6158434748649597, 0.7903502583503723, 0.8368764519691467, 0.9282853007316589, 0.8739978075027466, 0.8038374781608582, 0.8547061085700989, 0.8122420310974121, 0.8966524004936218, 0.8693922162055969, 0.870349109172821, 0.8237766623497009, 0.7813993692398071, 0.8476742506027222, 0.8797675967216492, 0.7544390559196472, 0.8954808712005615, 0.7891213297843933, 0.8101493716239929, 0.8152787685394287, 0.8833290934562683, 0.878655195236206, 0.8672990202903748, 0.8204638957977295, 0.89817875623703, 0.8681560158729553, 0.8040590882301331, 0.7245575785636902, 0.7974612712860107, 0.8665967583656311, 0.8796757459640503, 0.912717342376709, 0.8924393057823181, 0.8707777857780457, 0.9065701365470886, 0.9526705145835876, 0.9180349707603455, 0.8988223075866699, 0.6210054755210876, 0.809252917766571, 0.8724752068519592, 0.8717138767242432, 0.7921099066734314, 0.8931412100791931, 0.7473406195640564, 0.7172251343727112, 0.8605660796165466, 0.7922624945640564, 0.8064011931419373, 0.8924681544303894, 0.8623369336128235, 0.9071540236473083, 0.9006842374801636, 0.9195072054862976, 0.7020557522773743, 0.8294917941093445, 0.9073576927185059, 0.8548030257225037, 0.8256917595863342, 0.8264631628990173, 0.8655651211738586, 0.7814489603042603, 0.8588448166847229, 0.6819632649421692, 0.8776481747627258, 0.8338674306869507, 0.7891052961349487, 0.4366295337677002, 0.8727369904518127, 0.8897466063499451, 0.8532752394676208, 0.83757084608078, 0.9102824926376343, 0.8269725441932678, 0.8521820902824402, 0.8292104601860046, 0.8728672862052917, 0.8641828894615173, 0.9153502583503723, 0.8306214213371277, 0.8605222105979919, 0.8404277563095093, 0.7321264147758484, 0.7474661469459534, 0.8856627345085144, 0.7942205667495728, 0.8953478932380676, 0.8729189038276672, 0.9089358448982239, 0.8584974408149719, 0.9069694876670837, 0.9259949326515198, 0.8729814291000366, 0.6443950533866882, 0.9022545218467712, 0.7887663245201111, 0.848940908908844, 0.7895861268043518, 0.9070440530776978, 0.9007346630096436, 0.7896859049797058, 0.910435140132904, 0.9110792279243469, 0.8674589991569519, 0.8577976822853088, 0.8600168228149414]}